All is good in the hood.
I am that person who can't see the forest but for the trees. I've been in the thick of a few work issues and I totally forgot to contribute today!!! This is how life has been getting away from me since August of 2010.
MINI RANT:
Co-Workers were heard saying: What kind of a mother is she not helping her daughter fight this? She must have really been a horrible mother!
04 Stone Free
Why did Grandma say she was born in Iowa when she was actually born in Ohio?
We must observe that Jesus Christ did not present anything positive. We are told, in this modern day, that we (as preachers) must be more positive in our approach. Three days passed as Saul considered his personal plight. During that time he prayed. I am assured that he was agonizing in prayer for his eternal destiny was in a balance.
It’s also clear that tensions between Smith and Abraham have grown increasingly bizarre – and public – in recent weeks. The doctor alleged that he was stabbed on April 12 after being lured to a trap by a man offering to sell him compromising pictures of the lawyer. Abraham recently took out an advertisement offering an award for information about someone he claimed was slandering his family.
I loved this book. I have a massive girl crush on her and if I could have a literary dinner with some of my favorite authors, she would be on the invite list. I love everything I've ever read by Hilary Mantel, I freely admit, and Bring Up the Bodies is no exception. It's that book I was anticipating receiving so much that I became listless in my reading of anything else while I waited for it to arrive in the mail, knowing that it didn't really matter what I was reading, I would drop it the minute I got my hands on this one. That's exactly what happened, and the book didn't disappoint.
Running is not something that I enjoy—but I really like the results my body has seen from it. I get off on the feeling of euphoria after a run. I love having something that I am good at. This is why I hope—I pray—that my appointment on Wednesday with the orthopedist goes very smoothly and he tells me the fix is easy and simple…and I’ll be running at my peak again very soon.
where the insights and gifts of all God’s people are fully realized
“Not funny, you little brat,” Natalie spat.
tossing messages
*walks ALL over the place
That’s what I’m talking about.
I've also been struggling with where to go from here. I know I want to keep up with Tuesday slices, but I can't keep up more than one blog. My original intention was for this blog, "Refining Our Craft" to be reflections of our teaching lives, but I don't think it's stretch to include writing in with the "Craft." After all, I strongly believe that to be good writing teachers we need to be writer's, so I feel I will be doing just that.
As the title so cleverly hints, I have acquired a juvenile cat. Kitten, if you’d prefer.
When every wavelet is tinged with gold,
Salads do not (always) need lettuce.
You let go and I’ll let go too
In My Name Is Khan, Bollywood superstars Shah Rukh Khan and Kajol Devgan inhabit the most challenging roles of their careers. Rizvan Khan is an honorable Muslim man from India, living with Asperger’s Syndrome, who falls unconditionally for the beautiful Mandira, a Hindu single mother living out her version of the global dream of success. Yet, when an unspeakable act of cowardice tears their family apart, Khan selflessly embarks on a powerful journey through a contemporary America that is as complex as the terrain of the human heart. He innocently becomes that most unlikely act of defiance, one of peace and compassion.
person is drawn to you, it is harder for him to pull away because he is attracted to you.In
The deck has 68 cards in all and is decided into several groupings.
And then there's the music. What can one say, but that Mr. Astaire is, in large part, responsible for some of the greatest songs of all time coming into being. Composers like Jerome Kern, Rogers & Hart and Irving Berlin set to work writing masterpiece after masterpiece for his films, and in this case its Mr. Berlin who wows us with tunes that have become part of the fabric of our culture. The title song, of course. "Isn't This a Lovely Day?" "The Piccolino" And then... "Cheek to Cheek".
I'm not certain how it happened, but I wound up using almost the exact same color scheme as I did yesterday. Especially since I was playing around with blue and green colors in anticipation of a blog hop I'm participating in next month. I was dying fabric flowers & somehow I ended up using purple, pink and teal:
The recessions hit, and Julian’s business was the first of many businesses to flounder quickly into that American cesspool I referred to as Bankruptcy. Now our combined income was just shy of a little more than a grand a month-thanks to unemployment. Our home still remains in our possession but facing Foreclosure any minute. All services have been cancelled. Both Hummers and the Caravan had been repossessed-we now commute around in a 1998 silver Toyota corolla sedan. All credit cards-except for one-have been maxed out and charged off. Both checking accounts are ridiculously overdrawn, and what is a vacation anyway?
Liberally applied perfume or aftershave...I'm not sure which
Waist Coat – what we’d think of as a vest, these had a high collar and could be double breasted but were usually single breasted
Part twenty two
Painefull Out
Recovered from my car accident
I need to bust a move on my mystery sock design for the Sock Knitters Anonymous Mystery Sock KAL in January. My test knitters are ready. I am not. But I shall conquer that this weekend.
The empty storage bins we used to cart his stuff to university last August had been stored haphazardly in the space above the garage. Most often I do not climb the disappearing ladder to retrieve Christmas decorations, luggage or storage bins. That's why we have a teen-ager!
L'Occitane Labdanum
Approaching middle age, I am trying to look up nutrition and benefits of foods that we eat. Although I include lot of fruits (as many as vegetables), there were certain fruits, I had not tried. Kiwi was one such fruit that I would almost pick up from the counter and drop back. Since they were always imported into the countries that I have lived, they came with a heavy price tag, for fruits. That may have been the primary reason and the fact that the seeds were crunchy and left an after taste was another put off. Thus, I might slice just one fruit in a fruit salad or add as topping to some custard.
“Understood, certainly,” said Rothmon stroking his long grizzled beard. “In fact perhaps the Adventure Guild can offer some assistance to you in this regard. There is a new group of adventurers who have recently signed on, and I believe at least some of them may be interested in joining you. Why don’t I arrange for a meeting between you and them for this afternoon, say at 3pm?”
1 isolated
"He was using his drug pad, prescription pad, to write out prescriptions for OxyContin in exchange for crack cocaine," said Officer Mike McCall of the Jacksonville Sheriff's Office.
The Stendhal Syndrome (1996)
Landon and one of his best buds
Welcome to my first post in ohhhh... ages!! Apologies for that but I have a stinking cold and just cannot stop sneezing - yuck!! That and the streaming eyes have seriously set me behind on my crafting :-(
We decorate with ornaments we've made and collected over the years. One ornament is a Shrinky Dink I made in preschool! Remember those?
Realitytrader provides a community where traders can refine their trading skills with helpful hints and tips from those that trade the market everyday in a safe, affordable and non-threatening environment.
So often have I longed to mold
My aunt Sandy was always the life of the party. Such a social butterfly. Sound familiar?...thought so. :) Her home was always open to family and friends. Her motto was the more the merrier. I know that heaven just got a lot more lively with her up there running around making sure that everyone is having a good time.
Light Whole Wheat Baguette
One thing I can say, with this Job hiatus, I’ve definitely grown closer to my family. Often I tweet about them, as I tweet about everything (twitter.com/loconsoho)…My Great Aunt, who, when you talk to her, likes to perhaps talk about God a bit too much, but at 76, something’s you just excuse. Which she also never fails to mention “I’m 76 now baby, you have to check on me more”… lol as I grow older, I grow to love and accept my family for what they are, and all that they are; perhaps it’s not what I asked for, but it is what I was given… and I must live with that…
It is clear that the horde are massively over-represented as raid bosses, though, as no alliance race has more than one to their name. I wonder if that will change in the coming battle. Additionally, apparently females are far nicer than males on Azeroth, because of those raid bosses listed here, a vast majority are males around the order of 75%. This discrimination is, of course, pretty typical to fantasy fare, but I’d have expected more from Blizzard. Ah well.
Les: "You remember that creep Chuck Lorre, right? You met him during that wicked weekend in Cabo. Anywho, he's pitching me this show about four genius roommates trying to make it in the big city and shit, yo. What do you think?"
(19)
Within the expat community, which includes skilled professionals who come to work in another country on their own or those sent by their employer, many (the majority?) are not interested in integrating in the culture and prefer their own social circles, but there are also those who want to engage in social, political or other issues of public concern in their new home country.
There’s nothing to read around here
Nope, Cat and Bones come to this book with previous expectations. High Expectations. And this book does deliver. The relationship is strong and still growing. Frost allows her characters to grow without changing who they are at their base. The repartee between the two is still strong as is the heat of their love. A little jealousy is thrown in (on both sides) to add a little spice.
Cityscape flatware, by Oneida
First time for the last few days that I've had any! I've been so busy with pre-teens being extremely demanding, a sick baby and trying to get some time with the hubby that I nearly forgot what it was like to get 5 mins silence.
The only light spot in my day so far was that I got to choose my group in my nursing class and I got to be in a group with people I know. Thank god. It should be ok. A lot of reading and stuff but I should be fine.
So now I'm on a first-name basis with a pawnshop guy. Mom would be mortified. --Pg. 136 of an ARC of "Breaking Beautiful" by Jennifer Shaw Wolf
Dax is Pryseis’ nephew, half-troll/half-faerie. He was traveling w/Pryseis when they were attacked by the goblins. Pryseis was taken prisoner and Dax would have died if Benilo hadn’t come along. Benilo orders Dax to carry a message to the elves. King Loren is reluctant to risk a war over two missing people, but Brannan can’t stand the thought of his mentor in danger and so determines to mount a rescue of his own…with Dax’s help.
Words which call for the death of, or physical harm to, our elected leaders.
Distinguishing Features: SILVER HAIRS
Asked whether the events were connected, an ISAF spokesman would only say: “There was a demonstration in the province.”
Lettuce can be started indoors 4-6 weeks prior to the average last frost for a spring garden or mid summer (for us northerners) for a fall crop. Starting seedlings indoors works especially well for fall gardens since high temperatures can hang on late into the summer some years. Plant seedlings outdoors when temperatures constantly stay in the 70's or cooler in the fall.
Flourishes' I Love Roses Stamp Set
Topic the Third: Losing’s Only Half the Battle
This short story is based on actual events that occurred during my brother-Muhammad Dawjee’s-visit to India in December 2011. On his return, it was one of the first experiences he shared with me. I was so inpired by the emotion conveyed in his narrative that I decided to turn it into this in the hope that it offers up some sort of gratitude for having shared it with me in the first place. I only hope that it does his tale justice.
and S. Boulardii, which can help support a healthy digestive and immune
A woman on Salon Personals advertises: “Q: Why should you get to know me? A: My mind is as dirty as subway platform.”
“Australians are the best.” Muz says. In her shows, “Americans are a little too cool for school, so they don’t really play along very well…English people will make a fool of themselves. Give them half a reason and they will, so that’s no fun…the audience likes to watch one of themselves, to watch one of them volunteer and be shy at first, and then transform, and then there’s a dramatic arc right there. That’s what makes the best audience contestant, someone who has an inherent arc. They want to be wild and free, but they just need a little bit of a push. That’s what is the most beautiful thing, and Australians are naturally like that.”
Thanks again to everyone who follows and reads my post! This has been a great giveaway... I'll be doing something special for everyone who didn't win in the next few days!
And just like that we’ve been here for 5 months. I felt as though I had so much to reflect on and now I can’t seem to put it all into words. Here we are, almost 5 months into our South Korea experience and I still haven’t created the elaborate blog I thought I would be enticed to create. In fact, I haven’t done too many things that I ‘thought’ I would be doing. As I look back at my first post I wonder if maybe that’s a pleasant symptom of living in the moment. Reflecting seems to feel opposite of my instinct which is to just be in it.
Tekwan Palembang is the typical food made from fish and sago are made in small size, and is presented using the sauce with a distinctive taste. Typically complementary Tekwan is vermicelli and mushrooms (source: Wikipedia) Material Tekwan:
2- The sweats I'm wearing make my thighs look like jello stuffed in gray sausage casing.
The message was from A. I was groggy and re read the messages again. I was shocked to receive a message from him after all this time. And the way he spoke … why, it's as if nothing happened.
And griefs around me spread, be Thou my Guide;
What to look out for
If you're a creative director it's because you didn't say "Look, I know this will be unpopular, but this just isn't good enough to let out, let's work out how to make it better, even if we have to push the deadline back, or work all night."
So, tomorrow I'm going to further my slaying of self by serving others through a local Body, and I'm going to reap the amazing efforts of serving a selfless God.
Sleeping isn’t just about refreshing us for the day ahead. It also has a more long-term impact on our health. The deep REM sleep associated with dreams actually shuts off our brain’s stress chemistry and soothes our most painful memories.
The old woman smiled, this is how I used to live you know, she said. 'Petra motioned the old woman to follow her. As 'Petra moved from the bedroom to through the hall, dining room and stopping in the lounge snapping her fingers on the way. Everything transformed. The dirty carpets turned into gorgeous wood and marble flooring, wallpaper was repaired and cleaned, chandeliers aglow and sparkly, furniture sparkling clean and the air clean and fresh. The high ceilings, stuccowork and paneled walls looked like it had in it's heyday 20 years earlier. It looked amazing, and just like 'Petra remembered.
Week 8 was REALLY lacking on the photos, but that's okay. I LOVE that I got to include memorabilia from our everyday life more than usual. My daughter found a prom dress - quickly. The story that goes with it is inside the first 3x4 insert card. A postcard from the optamalogist; a picture of ideas she liked; a piece of the fabric from the dress she chose; a dinner card from the restaraunt we ate at Saturday night; a tag from hubby's "drink of choice" these days . . and thank goodness for my daughter taking photos with her iphone too or I wouldn't have ended up with half the pictures I did get! (PS the dress image insert is not what she bought, it's just what she went with the mind to try on).
More information will become available during the next few months as the Board’s budget process continues, and the ECNO initiative proceeds.
I'll be very interested to hear what my readers feel could be appropriate solutions.
Then our attention is drawn upwards as the metallic curtain washes over us like a wave. Eventually it regresses and our skyward gaze reveals a pool/giant slip-and-slide over our heads filled with a few inches of water lit from above and gathering around the silhouette of a body. The water washes over her as it ebbs and flows from side to side like waves in a pool. She is joined by another, then another, and then a fourth body, all sliding, tumbling, jumping, playing in the water and casting the most spectacular patterns in the water for us underneath to see. At one point, a girl poled her head underwater and looks directly at the audience, the pool is lowered down to just above our heads, we touch the thick clear plastic holding their water world in place and literally probe the fourth wall in effort to feel that inate human connection between us, the masses, and the dancing girls in a world of water overhead. Strobe lights, water dance, pulsing music, and the pool lifts itself back up to the rafters leaving us with a beautiful image of four bodies joined together like a puzzle in the sky. Black out.
Tomato Chickpea Curry
Q: Why do mermaids hold such fascintation?
__Appearance of Scythians in the Ukrainian steppes coincides with the beginning of Greek colonization of the North Black Sea Coast. Beginning from the 7th century B.C. the natives of Greece and Asia Minor, founded cities-states, such as Olbia, Panticapeum, Chersonesos, Tira and others, which become the centres of jeweller production and interrelation of the two cultures – the Greek and the Scythian ones.
Margaret Mahy's book has also had a different title. In New Zealand where Harper Collins published it last year, it was called The Magician of Hoad. And if you go to the Faber website in the UK it has a huge subtitle shown on the jacket as The Battle for the Heart of Hoad.
Just the other day, Mark Bittman of the NYT was urging his readers to try a scattering of nice dishes he had come up with. He suggested that a vegan diet might be a good weight management strategy. Oh! "Weight management" means you are too heavy. I am not too heavy, far from it.
Presently, loving someone has yet to pay off as being a lucrative investment
Only after posting the picture on flickr with the above caption, I found out that George is a renowned contemporary British artist (part of art duo Gilbert and George) and obviously quite used to be photographed.
Bottoms all know that it is not smart to ever say the name of a top even if it is a compliment. On Saturday afternoon, I whispered to Maire how nicely LS looked in her purple dress. Did I mention how tops have super hearing at spanking parties? Well LS heard my comment and asked us to stand up and face her.
What does this kind of talk do for warmth in relationships? What does it do for the individuals in those relationships?
The man in black fled across the desert, and the gunslinger followed.
Some hospitals require the placenta to stay at the hospital until you discharge, some don't care when it goes home or who takes it, and some will require a release form. Make sure you know what your hospital requires prior to birth so that whomever is taking it home will know.
Hopefully ya'll like this idea & respond because I'd love to get some extra writers on this blog!!
Last week the husband suggested to me that we have a no carb week this week. He went to Mississippi to visit his best friend and knew he'd be over indulging. Last year we started the year off with a no carb week, but this year we were running a half marathon on January 15th, so going without carbs the first week of the year was going to be more detrimental than helpful. Since we both tend to get tired of the no carb thing quickly I chose all new dinner recipes to try and keep it exciting for us. Enter Pinterest.com. I did a search on low carb meals and came up with a bevy of ideas. Some have been good, some have been okay, nothing has been awful. I've had an easier time this week than in times past cutting out carbs, maybe because I'm more used to doing it now? I don't know. Or maybe I know we're just doing it through Monday, so the end is near already.
Row 9: 2 sc in first sc, sc in next 2 sc, 2 sc in last sc, ch 1, turn (6).
"Something Wicked This Way Comes" by Ray Bradbury
Yet her innate ability morphs into an unchecked desire for justice—or is it vengeance?—whenever she’s forced to Kill a murder victim, craving to stop the attackers before they can strike again. So when people start to die—that is, people who aren’t supposed to be dying, people who have committed grievous crimes against the innocent—Lex’s curiosity is piqued. Her obsession grows as the bodies pile up, and a troubling question begins to swirl through her mind: if she succeeds in tracking down the murderer, will she stop the carnage—or will she ditch Croak and join in?
### rnz.co.nz Monday 4 July 2011 at 09:08
The other aspect is sustenance of the solution reached upon. Because crumbling of peace is almost inevitable in most of the cases – soon after.
at Moss Springs standing broadside
gained tremendous respect.
We have to make sure that we don’t console the effect of a patterned and unacceptable behavior. By doing so we can inadvertently create a pattern of excusing the behavior that causes the problem. We then allow the person to carry on as always without accountability or accepting their share of the responsibility for the effect and mess they are now in and the behavior continues. And as long as this happens, they remain blind to the issue. For people to change, it’s important that they become honest about their role in the cause and own up to the effect they now face whatever it may be. Once they learn to accept responsibility for their behavior and have to work out of it on their own in some instances, they have no choice but to change. They will decide that reaping the seed they sewed wasn’t the effect they really wanted.
How do you stay motivated to accomplish whatever goal you've set?
You should find us at the library, ready to read and critique, every Monday night at 7:30 except for the following dates:
Now on to my blog candy for day 3 of this hop. Since Scrapping Bug Designs is our guest designer for today I have decided to giveaway the amazing prize that Scrapping Bug Designs has so generously sponsored this hop with. Chrissy from Scrapping Bug Designs has donated a gift certificate valued at $50.00 of free paper piecing patterns of the winners choice for this hop.
That's what we're doing here: giving and receiving, sharing and learning, helping and supporting.
4- Truth" - 5:15
The Pretoria Magistrate's Court acquitted him on a count of fraud.
Drama, Rated PG, 115 Minutes
I don't know, my love.
As you can see by my recent lack of blog posting, I have been EXTREMELY busy lately and haven't had much time to do anything other than work work work. The last time I was able to actually get out and do something was a few weeks ago when I tore myself away long enough to enjoy lunch with the fam at Old Chicago and it seems like an eternity ago! Here are a few pics from that day.......
After some discussion, we’ve decided to move the eggs to the swampy area between us and the mailbox. I’ve also offered them to local homeschool families. I figured the children would love to watch them become tadpoles and then toads. I’ve even considered bringing a few eggs inside to watch them for a while myself. I’ve always found such things to be fascinating.
taken from -
Would you be afraid of Gort? I’d be afraid. What’s not to fear from a malleable metal juggernaut from another world, with the strength of a tank and a death-ray built into his head? When Gort’s visor rises, he can direct the ray so precisely that it can disintegrate a soldier’s rifle and leave the soldier unharmed. But if Gort wishes, that ray can do the same to any human being, reducing him or her to bubbling slurry on the grass.
10. O Mary Don't You Weep
used to relate an anecdote about how, as a small child, she
Jin said, “By the story Steve told that Sandra had made them to believe I don’t trust that Sandra girl. She was purposely sent out of the facility to capture all of us minus the bloodshed. I know these guys. This is governments best weapon to send in a girl and bring down the whole house.”
CALLER: OK.
Thanks again to Loretta and Shel for this week's challenge. Had it been ANYTHING other than Hands, I would not have played (or rather had time to play). Now I must remember to link to Inspiration Avenue on Friday (the day I post my IA challenges) because this is definitely a scheduled post I finished Monday night.
After my four-day weekend trip to Eugene, I followed my four-day work week with a four day weekend trip to Spokane for Bloomsday, a huge 12K event. I've run it annually for several years--2012 was my fifth time. Last year I pulled off a surprise PR (1:04:55) two weeks after the Boston marathon. This time, a week after Eugene, I had no plans for a PR. I just hoped I wouldn't embarrass myself (I think I figured anything slower than a 9-minute pace would be unfortunate).
The first and most important is to speak the truth, always and everywhere also about Islam. Like the Americans, the people in the Netherlands and other European countries desperately need a First Amendment.
(3) Another interesting fact which comes to light when we try to reconstruct the original Aramaic in which our Lord’s sayings in all the Gospels were spoken is that very many of these sayings exhibit poetical features. Even in a translation we can see how full they are of parallelism, which is so constant a mark of Old Testament poetry. When they are turned into Aramaic, however, they are seen to be marked by regular poetical rhythm, and even, at times, rhyme. This has been demonstrated in particular by the late Professor C. F. Burney in The Poetry of our Lord (1925). A discourse that follows a recognizable pattern is more easily memorized, and if Jesus wished His teaching to be memorized His use of poetry is easily explained. Besides, Jesus was recognized by His contemporaries as a prophet, and prophets in Old Testament days were accustomed to utter their oracles in poetical form. Where this form has been preserved, we have a further assurance that His teaching has been handed down to us as it was originally given.
I'm that mom who plays World of Warcraft and runs dungeons with her kids and enthusiastically shows them her new drake mount and lets them fly it all around. I'm that mom who will spend her morning helping a child level up a character while they sleep soundly in their beds.
2 leeks, the whites cut in half lengthwise and thinly sliced
The popular rationale for the attorney angle goes like this: In the course of their work, attorneys must speak often and eloquently. Such a rich alcoholic drink — so the thinking goes — would both soothe their throats and relax the nervous among them to better prepare them for their loquacious undertakings.
You weren't the best year that I have had but then again you weren't the worst
My patio pot cherry tree leans queasily to one side.
My mom bought us a cute little teapot for Christmas. I love it! In fact, I love it so much that I encouraged my teenage son to try it out. Guess what? He loves it too. This morning I had to go searching his bedroom in the dark for it. :)
I still love Christmas day, presents around the tree and Christmas dinner and oodles of chocolate.
....? - Apple (won't know the number until next month, but it's been holding at #3 or #4 in Hist Fantasy all month in the US and is #2 in AU, so I'm assuming some sales have been made)
Starting today, we are going to change our challenges to a bi-weekly challenge for the summer to give everyone a chance to spend time with their families (including us - lol)! So, you now have TWO weeks to get your projects in OR enter as many times as you like....it's all for fun... (well, AND the chance to join us as a GUEST DESIGNER)!! So we hope you will join us for this challenge and check back on July 9th for a new challenge!
The District Attorney looks like someone off of PBS.
Are you sporting green today?
And you guys were so great about sending me titles for the Beach Woman! :)
1 reaping
‘Twat. What about him? You think he did it?’
So I encourage others until I'm drained dry and wrung out. Because I love it and it's my calling.
I'm sorry to all of you that noticed I was missing. I'm sure its been crazy making that I'm no longer around. But there is nothing I can really do about it. Work and life has been keeping me very very busy. and we don't have any internet.
Joaquin is very engaging because of his enthusiasm for both music and dancing, and his English is better than excellent: he can really express his enthusiasm and explain things simply and clearly, and he seems to understand the problems people have with the music and the dance. As a tango musician, a bandoneonista, he is aware of the subtleties of rhythm and melody, and of melodic structure, and he wants to bring this awareness to dancing. I can't help thinking that this is how the dance should be taught: the dance is always a response to the music, so we need to learn to listen to the music and to respond to the melodic and rhythmic structures in it. Just learning steps and dancing them against a background of tango music isn't the same thing: it's an unfortunate concentration on a superficial part of the whole, it's putting the cart before the horse.
3. Assertive – “If it is urgent, I would definitely do it. I have a family trip planned for the weekend. If it can wait till monday, I shall do that first thing on monday.”
Did you watch the show? What was your favorite part? Or your favorite gown? How'd you feel about Billy Crystal hosting again? I thought he was better than James Franco and Anne Hathaway last year, but still not as good as he's been in the past. Overall, the show was only okay for me. Good thing the dresses were extra lovely to make up for it!
We hope that our Christmas/New Year update found you well and that your holidays included wonderful times with family and friends. We had a very pleasant holiday season, including one really fun Christmas party with lots of our Brazilian friends here at our house...they are so much fun!! Love love love them. Very thankful for our sweet, fun friends God has given us here!
So, if you're now excited about getting some good deals on some books, here are some links to help you along.
And did you see the view from the room Pantone 186 (above)? Stunning.
2. Trulia (from Apps Store) (now allows you to search sales and rental’s plus use your “current location”)
As for the sunscreen company: I understand that you have to gussy up your “tip list” with other ideas, so it didn’t look like all you care about is selling more sunscreen. But it sure looks like all you care about is selling more sunscreen (and coming up with ridiculous new worries, so the idea of kids slathering themselves in sunscreen for 15 minutes of recess seems less extreme.) — L
1 center
NVIC's partnership with Mercola.com, which ranks in the top five most visited health information websites in the world, is strengthening and expanding NVIC's three decade call for the institution of informed consent protections in US vaccine laws. Mercola.com hosts NVIC.org and NVICadvocacy.org and has worked with NVIC since 2008 to research and disseminate referenced information about vaccination and health.
... Because I'm free
You have to make a solid commitment to become a person of integrity. You can’t just drift in and out when you feel like it. You must be consistent in your actions. My public persona would sometimes, and I reiterate, sometimes belie my private persona. There is the inconsistency. What I have been trying to do in recent times is to join these two together and dump the negative actions. My ta moko (Maaori Tattoo) has helped immensely in this transitional phase of my life. I do believe that in doing so I will become a ‘whole’ new person. Not too far away from the person I already am either. Just a person with stronger integrity whom I would like to think will be a positive influence on my daughters, whanau and friends. Again long journey but made easier with everyone’s support.
I never met Andrew Breitbart, and to be honest I didn’t really visit his websites very often. But he was a spirit that I connected with, in a way. As a resident of the Brentwood district of Los Angeles, Andrew Breitbart was surrounded by liberalism all his life. Yet he fought through it to find the light of traditional values and conservative beliefs, and then he promoted his beliefs relentlessly – sometimes to a fault. He was accused of being over-the-top and extremely partisan, even though his values align with the majority of Americans, and he and his associates unearthed some very important information that the traditional media types wanted nothing to do with.
I placed my hand into his and then the whole world shifted.
I really wanted this layout to be pretty but also have a nice romantic element to it. Then I found these beautiful new papers from the Bo Bunny Country Garden collection and knew they'd be perfect! This photo of Shannon and I was taken in August last year. A beautiful photo of us, definitely one of my favourites!
www.incomeaccess.com
Pakatan leaders who attended the gathering included DAP president Karpal Singh, Kelantan PAS deputy commissioner II Datuk Husam Musa, Penang Chief Minister Lim Guan Eng, state exco member Elizabeth Wong and Teresa Kok.
But alas, all good things must come to an end. We're back in the mean ol' boogie-down Bronx tonight, and boy the differences could not be any more extreme! See, we left behind daily temps in the upper 70s and low 80s, with vistas such as these:
Me: Is it filling?
the big sis and i went to work while daddy put the boy to bed.
So we’re going to the chapel with Joey Ramone and one or the other as soon as he’s man enough. That’s when we’ll know, also, whether he is a bantam or standard sized rooster. He’s only 5 days old, or so, and I think that he has to be 7-9 months old before he can breed.
And so, I encounter other dusk walkers beneath the fading light with their little people in tow....
Olive Oil, 2 tablespoons.
Presenting Mr. & Mrs. Joey Fleming - October 10
“It’s for our benefit too. Now we are flying our two Fokkers, which carry 60 people and are good for the flight to Amman,” he said.
1 tsp of vanilla
The following day we saw a house that we loved and made and offer on it. Today all of the stars aligned and we sold one house and bought another. We never even had to put our house on the market. I am so relieved, no more perfectly clean and tidy house. Just for fun, I left dirty dishes in the sink and clothes on the floor, because I can.
I'm off to a food and wine fair called Passion which I've been looking forward to for weeks now (-: !!!
Common warts, which can appear anywhere on the body, are rough little bumps. Plantar warts, which occur on the bottom of the feet, are typically hard, flat, and rough.
When you KNOW that there’s a market for a book and it’s not necessarily your heart’s desire, but a way to make income, maybe you should consider writing a book like that every other book or every fourth book.
(Drop it, I tell you- put that kitten down!)
I have excellent feedback from 99.9% of my customers - I really do try to provide an item I am proud of and with fast shipping - I am proud of the service I provide;
I like to flaunt my scores to people who can't get them.
Until then, be careful what you wish for...
I bought a lot more gluten free food yesterday. I tried out a bar of chocolate Endangered Species Chocolate at Whole Foods and shared it with hubby….very unusual for me, it was very good. No oily, greasy aftertaste like I sometimes get from other gluten chocolate. It had a shelf talker stating it was gluten free, but now in hindsight it has milk!!!
From the camera:: Today is Sanctity of Human Life Sunday - and this was our group of baby dedicators today. Hubs and I are in there, too! I'm the one who looks like I'm looking at the floor on the right side. Ha! But, what an amazing blessing to be a part of such a growing and baby - loving church!
Wyatt's birth story:
Oh, and be sure to keep an eye out next week for an article about my week driving a Kia Soul.
My friend is having a terrible battle with depression. I know a little something about depression, because back when I was in my late teens and early twenties, I had a pretty serious battle with it myself. I gave in to it, and it almost killed me. I used alcohol and drugs to numb away the pain, until I couldn't feel anything anymore, and I convinced myself that as long as I couldn't feel anything, I would be okay. But I wasn't okay. Everyone around me knew I wasn't okay, and they tried to tell me so, but I wasn't in any condition to hear them. I almost killed myself several times, both accidentally and on purpose, before my guardian angel stepped in and saved my life.
All photos (with the exception of the cover of the Pinkalicious book) by my beautiful, talented friend Sonya Balentine. She just started her own photography business. Check her out. She's awesome. And wonderful. And awesome.
Individuals should be willing to experiment with transition diets, and should have patience when learning how to combine vegetarianism with such social activities as dining out. Many vegetarian cookbooks are available to help new vegetarians prepare meals at home.
I am really proud of our effort and the final website. At first the only concern I had was that we were all very unclear on what to do but when we met and got a handle on what was to be completed the concern went away. I am proud of the entire website because it is a final presentation of a project that we all completed together. I’m also proud of the fact that there were four girls in a group with different schedules and obligations and we still managed to create a good website. I think the website is presented well and it is fun to read and all of the information is helpful.
Recept: She is a big star ...
Before picking any match for yourself, you must ensure that the site you are referring is credible and the sources are reliable. It is also an important to check the authenticity of the person with whom you are contacting. Like the companies conduct the background check of the employees being hired, it is also equally important to check every details of the person being contacted on these sites. In case of any spamming, the websites themselves block those people who have fake profiles.
“The DVD comes with a fully referenced transcript with over 150 citations from the scientific literature.”
We're probably forgetting as much as we're including, but we hope you'll forgive us.
The Tehrik-i-Taliban Pakistan claimed responsibility for a pair of suicide bombings on a Frontier Constabulary training center in Charsadda that left at least 80 dead in what the militant group said was in revenge for the “Abbottabad incident,” referring to the death of al-Qaeda leader Osama bin Laden (Reuters, AFP, AP, Dawn, NYT, Guardian, WSJ, Post). Pakistani police officials, however, were skeptical that the attack, the deadliest in Pakistan since November, was the work of the TTP, and suggested it may have been orchestrated by Omar Khalid’s group, which is currently fighting the Pakistani Army in Mohmand. At least 140 were wounded (BBC, CNN). Yesterday in Karachi, Pakistani police said they arrested four TTP militants who were also affiliated with a Punjabi Taliban group (DT, AFP). And a suspected U.S. drone strike in North Waziristan has just killed at least three (AP, AFP).
Although the rendering of the car is clearly wearing 2011 spec wings, vanes and brake ducts, its evident the car is another step forward in design terms for the team.
And the rain keeps on falling..
Muslims think my own religious views, religion or lack thereof are somehow relevant. How or why this is, is of course not explained. Heck, why not accuse me of being a Jew? Everybody knows that everything bad that happens to Islam or Muslims is the fault of the Jews.
Mandatory Entry: Message Christina on Facebook- Just tell her you are from my blog and ask for more info on products. (You do not have to purchase anything to enter the drawing)
I don't think they did that story. They did have the kids write down a mistake they'd made and felt sorry about on a piece of paper though. Then the kids gave the papers to the leaders who lit them on fire while holding them in one hand. The message was - when you tell God about your mistakes, God forgives you and forgets about it; the mistakes disappear. So the leaders lit these pieces of paper on fire and they instantly (poof!) disappeared in mid-air. They used magic paper that completely went up in flames and vanished before it hit the ground.
This week is on its usual schedule. The big news is I got a diagnosis today of my elbow: torn muscle, probably no torn ligament. That's good news because it means no surgery and most likely a complete recovery. Apparently the normal recovery timespan is 3 months. That gives me about 5 weeks to go. I start physical therapy tomorrow. The pain has improved a lot in the last week or so, too.
The Anaesthesiologists thought the whole idea was a gas, and the Cardiologists didn't have the heart to say no, but the Urologists were pissed off about it.
Jay shrugs off comments like this as well as the odd stares he sometimes gets from the restaurant's patrons.
The ridiculous thing is that no one ever asked me for my excuses.
Hope you are having a terrific weekend wherever you are.
Doctor Brown proceeded to auction off the doctor’s stethoscope and skull to the audience, though he actually stopped short of giving away the items. He also got perilously close to squeezing a bottle of Heinz tomato ketchup over the guy’s shaven head or allowing the guy to squeeze it over his head. I have a terrible feeling he almost went through with this idea but pulled back from the unknown precipice at the last moment.
No Matter What QC: Created by Lisa Carter
One of my fool-proof strategies if it is a cocktail party followed by dinner, is to drink seltzer water throughout cocktail hour and then have one fabulous glass of red wine with dinner. You get a great taste and don’t feel bad in the morning (for several reasons). Another option is to have an alcoholic beverage first and then drink water or seltzer the rest of the night. Just do yourself a favor and steer clear of tonic water. It’s loaded with calories!!!!
Here’s the offer:
Galileo made two mistakes. The first was one that many scientists make. He believed that the truth, however disconcerting, was more comforting than being wrong and this led him to be completely open about his discoveries. He invited anyone who wanted to see for themselves the truth, by looking through his telescope, to do just that.
Russia is supporting China’s push to water down the resolution and also dislikes the idea of mentioning Article 41 in the resolution, council diplomats said. Article 41 does not authorize military intervention.
Evening all, I hope that you have all had a good day, this is my second post for today please scroll down to see the first one, I have been trying to do far too many things at once as usual lol and once again I am a member of the migraine patch brigade.
Next up is a really good take on risotto. I was watching the food network one morning while I was recovering from surgery and Ina Garten, aka The Barefoot Contessa, was on. She was making what she claims was a quick lunch for a friend. It was risotto with roasted butternut squash. No, watching Ina is a bit painful I think but as far as her cooking and her recipes, she has yet to lead me astray. Being a lover of seafood, butternut squash, etc, I decided to give this a go a few weeks later. I was very happy with the results. I made a few substitutions, mainly to accommodate for ingredients I actually had, but it was SOOO good.
WRITE UP #2: I received a negative score for an online survey. Apparently, a table complained that my service was slow even though we weren't busy. There weren't any details given to me about this table and I have no idea of the circumstances surrounding this table. Curiously, there were a lot of problems with the computers crashing/acting funny at this time...no idea if that was the case on this day. I didn't even know how to defend myself.
We’re in the final week of the online readalong on the One Island One Book blog– but you’re welcome to jump in at any point; the beauty of this is it can stay up there forever for anyone reading the book and we can continue the conversation as long as we want.
Do you want a clown
Two weeks prior, a nurse from the allergist calls to further explain the process. Over the course of a morning she will consume milk in various quantities, while we wait in between, hoping for no reaction. We will be in the safety of the hospital, in the event an adverse reaction occurs. She is not to have any food or non clear liquid after midnight, and the process should take six to eight hours from start to finish.
But then, Shoewawa quipped in with a similar thing, the "two for the price of one" philosophy. I also think that is BS since almost any item of clothing I own should be "two for the price of one" at least, or I won't buy it no matter the price. Items that can only be worn one way are rarly worn in my closet, and therefore it's basically junk preventing me from getting something I'll wear more often.
It was hard finding something to wear that wouldn't be stifling - it was 85 degrees today - and would still cover up my basement-cleaning bruises. Thank goodness for 3/4 sleeves and jet black hose. (Which I should probably wear while running because while I was out tonight, my friend Nicole yelled out her car window when she drove by, "Hey, nice tire mark on the back of your leg!")
Self-esteem will likely be regard we always maintain for our restoring. Many of us include a concept of alone, of might know about labeled self-concept. If you’d prefer that self-concept then you have a great self-pride.
Doe Maar Pa NL
And I've seen you at the corners and cafes it seems
Mattie closed her eyes as the Greyhound begins backing out of it’s stall letting herself indulge her guilt and grief. The pain was better than no memories at all and for all of the bits and parts that had fallen to hell over the years Mattie was thankful to her Lord on high that her memories never went with the rest. She settled into a daydream for a moment; imagining a cheek as delicate as silk brushing up against hers just as another unfair shake from God, in a life time of destructive and unfair personal quakes rippled over her moment of
Demon Squad: Resurrection by Tim Marquitz -- 75 out of 173 (Finally making some progress. Should finish this very soon. Great series.)
~that the money needs to be taken away from politics,
So I have stood on a boat which rescued over two hundred of the 300,000 soldiers stranded at Dunkirk! ( I have a total passion for History.)
8. Ice and decorate the cupcakes. These cupcakes don’t need a lot of icing-it is rich, so resist the urge to double the recipe and pile it on.
Drain pasta. Add to chicken mixture; mix lightly. Sprinkle with cheese. Remove from heat; cover. Let stand 1 minute or until cheese has melted.
SGL project engineer Thomas Mulaudzi and company lawyer Mpoyana Ledwaba acknowledged receipt of questions sent to them but they failed to respond.
07 Bozzio Solo
Pictured in Walnut. Available in Ebonized Oak and Cherry.
Yes I can!!! I used to be better at it when I was a kid but I can still do it :)
Post Script.
I shall start to think of it the way I think of presents. I love choosing presents for people, finding exactly the right thing. But choosing can be hard - what if I buy A and they would have preferred F? But they never know about F, so they will (I hope) be delighted with A. That's how it should be with books.
Johannesburg - A former senior police officer accused of fraud will face more charges when he appears in court next month, Mpumalanga police said on Thursday.
But I do feel so bad for the residents of south Bismarck who are frantically trying to save their homes, including the boss at my new temporary job. He reported this morning that although his home is still dry, he has huge carp swimming in his yard and swans floating through the trees.
We weren’t the only ones waiting there on the beautiful Saturday morning. There were a couple of tourists, some guys on old trucks, probably locals. Once we were allowed to go we passed that part that clearly was in the need of repair, parked on a side of the road just across from Albee Creek campground, packed up and went off on the trail, sort of.
But then where does one draw the line? Nya is already pushing the boundaries of what could be considered the “gray” area between right and wrong. Is it possible to slide across that line and down a path that will have too many consequences to allow a return to goodness?
These House Made Steamed Shrimp Shumai were a winner. They are larger than many shumai, but that is not a flaw, and it almost seems as if the exterior had been lightly fried because they had a slight crispness. The interior was a bit crunchy along with a smooth paste, and it seemed as if there were some decent sized pieces of shrimp in the shumai. Lots of flavor, a nice blend of textures, and an excellent presentation. Highly recommended.
I got mine off amazon for $12 and it had free shipping if you spent more than a certain amount so I bought a bunch of other stuff for Ollie too. I heard the refills can get pretty expensive but I also know that the plastic cartridges are reusable. You’re supposed to throw them out when you run out of plastic bag but if you re-pack it with regular waste bin liner/trash bags, its the same thing!
“Bye Mrs. Archer.”
This Norwegian story, 'East of the Sun, West of the Moon' was the myth of Psyche and Cupid in northern dress. The English stories, 'Tom-Tit-Tot,' and 'Stormy Weather' were variations of 'Rumpelstiltskin'. In 'Whuppity-Stoorie' the Rumpelstiltskin figure is female, and kindly – she saves the heroine from a life of drudgery in the end.
Undereducated? Was there ever a time when it took less
we just adore baseball. and yay to the season now upon us!
Gosh I never had any idea that I would ever reach so many people with my cards and projects but it is certainly a thrill to know that the numbers tell me that has happened. I have surpassed the 4000 Followers mark so it's time to celebrate!! I have been afforded the opportunity to be a member of a number of distinguished Design Teams and my life has been made richer by the people I have met along the way, which includes several companies that wanted to have a part of this celebration!!!
It isn’t often I am approached by total strangers. When I do I try to be courteous even if I am in a rush and they are looking for donations.
ZUG, SWITZERLAND, Apr 21, 2010 (MARKETWIRE via COMTEX) –Transocean Ltd. (NYSE: RIG) (SIX: RIGN) today reported a fire onboard its semisubmersible drilling rig Deepwater Horizon. The incident occurred April 20, 2010 at approximately 10:00 p.m. central time in the United States Gulf of Mexico. The rig was located approximately 41 miles offshore Louisiana on Mississippi Canyon block 252.
“Gather before me my loyal followers, *
Do you remember the first record or single that you ever bought?
When reheating to serve the next day (highly recommended), you will find that it will have thickened, so toss on the stove on low and add a bit more water/broth.
which makes it even more stressful for this momma.
Jane: 1 day old
fig jam, duck prosciutto & mint crostini
Tertullian comments that he removed the author of The Acts of Paul and Thecla from his position as presbyter for writing “writings that wrongly go under Paul’s name.”[90] Serapion, Bishop of Antioch in 180 AD, is recorded by Eusebius as writing Concerning the so-called Gospel According to Peter, a refutation in which Serapion wrote “We receive both Peter and the other apostles as Christ, but the writings which falsely bear their names we reject.”[91] Origen rejected the Doctrine of Peter since it was “not included among the books of the Church and…not a writing or Peter nor of anyone else inspired by the Spirit of God.”[92] The Muratorian Fragment records that “there is said to be another letter in Paul’s name to the Laodiceans, and another to the Alexandrians, [both] forged in accordance with Marcion’s heresy, and many others which cannot be received into the catholic church, since it is not fitting that poison should be mixed with honey”[93] and “the Apocalypse of John we also receive, and that of Peter, which some of our people will not have to be read in church. But the Shepherd was written by Hermas in the city of Rome quite recently, in our own times, when his brother Pius occupied the bishop’s chair in the church of the city of Rome; and therefore it may be read indeed, but cannot be given out to the people in the church either among the prophets, since their number is complete, or among the apostles at the end of the times.”[94] Clearly the early church had several leaders who thought very poorly of pseudepigraphal works and fought against their acceptance in the church.
Leaving the vintage Vista and memorable Memphis early in the morning, Hank and Bobbie-Joe decided to pass on the complementary continental breakfast of tinned fruit and cornflakes and hit the road at 9am for Dallas.
With a little bit of elbow grease... the paint... she will come off
Q: It must be so nice to sleep in and be able to nap whenever you want.
Leinster go into the match as favourites as they bid to become the first team since Leicester a decade ago to succesfully defend the trophy, and are also seeking their third Heineken triumph in just four years.
Anyway, back to the book search. Any suggestions?
There is yet to be a successful prosecution of a third-party recipient of a leak and the possible acquittal of Mr Assange on such a charge would be doubly embarrassing for the US administration.
Personally, I went to public schools all my life, but I would not recommend that anyone send their kids to public schools today.
So, rewind to March 2011…
Says ZeroHedge, "reactions such as the one yesterday confirm that the market is not only broken but also very stupid. Which is just as those in charge like it". Of course, the media loves quoting market reaction. It gets endless, easy headlines which save the jornos having to think. But more and more, we see day-to-day market movements as being irrelevant. The markets, like the politicians, inhabit their own little bubble.
This is another beer that totally blew my mind. After I had my first glass, I immediately emailed my buddy Paul Devries who works in sales for Goose Island to tell him how much I loved it. I wish I had saved the message so I could post it here. It would need a lot of editing and word replacement to be appropriate, but Dominique was so good he needed to know exactly how I felt about it. I've heard several times that it will never happen again and that makes me sad. I linked to Matilda, the base beer, since there's no information regarding Dominique on the Goose Island website.
It's just an old home-made thing which is a bit warped and worn and rusty.
I completed an initial short synopsis on The Book of Enoch for a past article, not completely understanding why it hadn’t been included as part of the Bible. After all, this guy supposedly walked with God himself and never encountered death. As a spiritual seeker, I would be highly interested to find out what his life involved to accomplish something so unprecedented. After a more detailed review, it became very clear. In many ways, on many levels, it contained information that was contrary to what the emerging “Christian” system had as its core doctrine and beliefs. It was deemed to not be “divinely inspired”, despite this incredible feat and being quoted by the likes of Jude and the early church fathers Iranaeus and Justin Martyr. among others. It tells a tale of a race of immortals who terraformed earth and cloned copies of themselves – early humanity - to serve essentially as slaves. And then for some reason, these beings led by “God” needed to go away and leave the Watchers behind to supervise their property and investment. Upon returning, this group is furious that the guardians had given both knowledge and technology to the lowly humans, as well as the secrets of magic. This is where the notion that “God” is an all-seeing, all-knowing being is shattered.
By the time I woke up the next morning, I could barely get my head off the pillow to sit up. I called my mom, and she took me to the emergency room, where she made sure I told everyone how I had hurt myself. (My mother has a strict no lying/no stealing policy). Much to my dismay, the (hot, young) doctor told me I had indeed sprained my neck (betcha didn't even think that was possible) and that I would need to wear a neck brace for a week. I had to go back to work like that, where I obviously couldn't tell people what had really happened but didn't want to lie (moms get in your head that way). I mean, if you say you were in a car accident or something...and karma hears you...well, you know.
cause SNAP
From time to time, one encounters people who really, really want to call themselves unschoolers. In some cases, they do this even though their lifestyles are way off the mark. "We're unschoolers," they say, even as they sit their kids down for lessons. Or they say, "We unschool on the weekends." Other times, the lines are fuzzier, and the people claiming the label are so close to what I consider real unschooling, but they can't quite let go of x, y, and z. So they cling to both the label and to x, y, and z.
We ought therefore to learn to pray aright, so as to be sure of answer.
Step one of this challenge begins today. Pick 5 areas that you want to learn more about. Here is a list of suggestions to help get you started:
Legs and Co are dancing to the sounds of Tavares. Lots of tambourine action.
What choices would you make?
4 wonder
“Fuck.” He whispered to himself, passing the glass back to the uniform. “Joe, make sure you do a complete tox panel. Looks like it might have been murder after all.”
Days later we were allowed to go home only to notice that our little “fella” was turning the color of a Sunkist orange. Not good. Not good at all. Rushed back to the hospital to be told it was simple “jaundice”. Nope, nothing in the child’s life would be simple, I found out. Days go on and before the first actual tulip bloomed that year we were in intensive care with our young guy. Jaundice ended up to be a “liver problem” – not yet determined, but possibly very serious and could lead to severe retardation. RSV nearly claimed his life. Reflux choked him every third breath. Our nightmare continued. You know you have a very sick baby when you can’t find room in the isolated PICU suite because of the number of doctors, nurses and respiratory therapists working with your child to keep him alive. You also know your baby is very ill when the nurses come and ask you questions such as, ‘Is there anyone we can call for you?” Does God have a hotline, I wonder? It was the power of prayer that I know got out through the darkest days.
Consistently enjoyable. That’s probably what this series is about. Despite its expansive cast, it does not ponder too much in developing the character save for the main protagonist, in this case, Jonah. As he fits in and sees the world from the perspective of Gun Dealers harboring the irony that he hates such individuals because of how they stir up people and consequently, trouble.
(3) The funding for the buy-sell obligation is provided by the income tax-free life insurance death benefit.
But through his music, I had learnt alot.
He was a nice young man who seemed to have a lot of knowledge and personality. I figured that at least I’d made the right choice in someone to aid me in my quest.
Today’s prayer: Lord, Your apostle, Paul, exhorted the Colossians, “whatever your work is, put your heart into it as done for the Lord and not for human beings, knowing that the Lord will repay you by making you His heirs (Col 3:23-24).” Thank You for those apostles, who risked their earthly lives to make sure Your Good News would survive, for their hard work and their staunch faith. Thank You for the book of love letters you left for us, to encourage and instruct us, and for Your blessings, who listen to Your parables and draw wisdom from them. You instructed the little children to come to You, Lord, and when we read Your parables, we are drawing them near to You, for You are wiser than we. Help me raise children who, when faced with difficult or tedious tasks, joyfully dedicate their labors to You — and please, Lord, mold me into an example I’d want them to follow.
The bag itself isn't bottomless, even though it feels like it when you're sitting on the couch grazing while a few hours of mindless television go drifting by.
Around, meeting strangers, with your eyes that
to be known as night is,
under $200 and those over $200 between Obama, Paul and Romney. Who has a broad range of support? Who is the populist candidate? A fascinating comparison... especially when you add in super-pacs, whose average contributors (for Romney) have been in the $100,000 range. Citizens United, anyone?
The cards are 3 3/8” by 5 ½”, with a reversible back (black, with two entwined ouroboros in the middle). The card face carries a ½” black border. For the Major Arcana, the card number (in Roman numerals) and the card name are in gold at the bottom of the card. The Minor Arcana Pips (numbered cards) show the card number and suit at the bottom of the card in gold lettering, while the Court cards show the card title and suit at the bottom of the card, in gold lettering.
Vine print top - Coldwater Creek
8:00 – Streetlab, Gordon Voidwell, Glass Ghost, Talk Normal, Asa Ransom, Buke and Gass, miniboone @ Glasslands $8 (21+)
They finally get the cycle started and get going with a fair amount of wobbling. The girl says that her name is Stiletta and asks Hex for his. She also says that he'll need to get a rado suit or the next acid storm will burn his flesh right off. Stiletta guides Hex back to her gang, the Reapers.
But yuh doin' me a favour,
They were surrounded by green. Everyone was. Everyone out on this delightful day, anyway. The sun had decided to grace the sky this past week, and oh how the nature was drinking it up. A small shower of rain was coming to an end, the last droplets glittering against the sunlight as they fell– only to dry up against the warm earth soon after. Raphael squinted against this sun, raking a set of long fingers through an even longer head of full hair. The red-brown strands, likely in need of a washing, tossing against his neck before it settled back down a small ways past his shoulder blades. The man didn’t look as pleased as everyone else seemed to be. A boot sheathed toe prodded forlornly a small puddle; it was all that remained from the rainy day, and this of course was no good. Raffy, as he was called for short, grimaced as he trudged on. The park was filled with families, littered with animals, and frothing over the edge with children. Well, at least there was that gain in this mess of an afternoon. He’d find himself, hands tucked away firmly in the pockets of his long overcoat, sinking down on a bench beneath a tree (it was positioned by the sandbox). At least the shade would block out the sun, and cast a necessary shadow over his face that did the job of masking the crooked smirk and the gleam in his green eyes. The birds chirped overhead, flirting with each other as they skipped across branches or landed by his feet. He wasn’t paying attention to them, soon his gaze would be caught up with a trio and a white cat.
Treatment of elevated blood pressure with medications has some benefits; but, aggressive treatment does not bring risks even close to normal. For example, over a 3-year period, men (40 to 59 years old) were found to have a 21% risk of death from stroke and a 20% risk of death from a heart attack even though their pressure was reduced from 183/114 mmHg to a level of 149/91 mmHg with medications.3 This compares to a 1% risk of death from either disease for people without hypertension (133/80 mmHg) over this same 3 year trial period. The obvious conclusion is you want to be a person without hypertension and you accomplish that goal for free by following a healthy diet and lifestyle.
Part of me feels in peace with whatever may happen, and still the thought of not physically
Dr. says if I don't see marked improvement by Monday, or if its any worse tomorrow, to come back to the hospital and they will admit me for more iv therapy, and to see an infectious disease Dr.
Taverns of Note:
She laughed lightly and cleared her throat. “Have a seat Lieutenant Manning. I can stay a bit longer.”
Looking at Los Sures “We will use an archival documentary (Los Sures by Diego Echeverria, 1984) about the South Williamsburg neighborhood as the inspiration as well as the primary online navigation for a set of new documentary projects that approach the same place and themes, now nearly thirty years later. New short interactive projects created by thirty different artists over three years will annotate and expand on the original film in ways previously unexplored.”
How costly can holding a class under a tree or perhaps a scenic spot be now? NOTHING AT ALL. Maybe hundreds of people could be taught in a single session, to get a ‘degree’ because of microphones which cost very little. Even MEDICINE could be taught in such places. Do we need to pay anything for unneeded buildings? The odd plaque or monument? The security guards and gardeners and drivers ON taxpayer paid salaries? Uniforms? The free transport AND meal subsidies which AGAIN taxpayers have to pay? I’d rather have no building and free degree than a building and a degree that costs half a lifetime of work to return – ON INTEREST to boot . . .
I stick more to earthy tones when making a guy quilt. I'll use darker tones for my cool colors and simpler prints on my brights; more tonals than large patterns too, but a lot of large patterns are really "girlie!"
I offer one final, fresh example of odd behaviour by the Telegraph. Over the last 36 hours, I have noticed this: every time Prince Andrew has been described as ‘worried’ about his role as a trade envoy – or Cameron has been described as being told to ‘get a grip’ about the issue – the online edition has not allowed comments. The more shrill the paper becomes about it, the more suspicious I become of Gallagher’s compulsive desire to bury the Prince’s reputation.
On the bright side, he is most likely alert in class and we finally
We also have three new Shining Stars to announce - this is not an easy task but oh how fun to look them all over 1 last time. Here they are, please stop over at their blogs and give them a little hello:
While such an escape is likely to happen eventually -- unless humans give themselves up to lefty-Luddite green faux environmental primitivism -- the kind of people who are attracted to top governmental and inter-governmental office these days are not usually the kind of persons who willingly give up control over others.
3) Rest well
 Hollywood – Casting Armansky, Armansky Audition, Thinking Evil Shit, Rape/Revenge, Int. Blomkvist’s Cottage, Int. Martin’s House, Int. Salander’s Apartment
I like to start a new pile every fall. I pile up the chicken manure, add anything else compostable that I have laying around, water it down really good, and ignore it! This gives it the winter to start breaking down. I don't turn it for the first time until the following spring. When spring comes, I mix it all up and start adding my kitchen scraps. I add to this pile all summer, bit by bit, and turn it whenever I feel like it. By late July, my compost is ready to screen.
His grin was impassive, enigmatic.
6. Untitled
You can choose to tough it out and enjoy a clean slate sooner; or you can reduce the dosage of our herbal formulas, and go through a longer journey to cleanse.
hearts beating til there’s only one
The third leg of protection is Critical Illness. Critical Illness is designed to pay a lump sum of cash, tax- free after 30 days of being diagnosed with one of 25 conditions, such as cancer, stroke, heart attack, kidney failure, heart valve replacement and more.
Seriously, though. Do you do all this stuff? I often have pictures of my characters, and perhaps a page of notes on them - but sometimes not. Sometimes I have nothing except what is in my head. How do you do it?
And this is the room
Top tip: Catch the post-work crowd on Friday then stay for the later-comers.
MUDVAYNE
Back Home:
Be fearless.
Mickey & Minnie!
On Being a WAHM (Work-at-Home-Mama): I have a studio in our home, but I do much of my work there while the kids are at school … I’m the kind of person who needs to have a certain amount of uninterrupted work time. Unfortunately, I get pretty crabby when I’m really in creative mode. Once I’ve got a project planned out and pieces cut, pressed, pinned, etc., I do sometimes let one of the kids work quietly in my studio while I put it all together, but mostly, if my children are home, I’m spending time with them or doing things that don’t require as much concentration. Ella and I have done a few sewing projects together, including a quilt that began as a fabric collage she made at art camp, lavender sachets we made for her teachers as holiday gifts, and felt brooches for party favors. Charlie has also shown some interest and one of my goals is to get him stitching with us more often.”
which is always a hoot : )
For this month's Secret Recipe Club, I was assigned to Jessie's blog, Vanderbilt Wife. After browsing through all her recipes, I knew exactly what I wanted to make - Fresh Strawberry Muffins. I am a strawberry fiend. Whenever it's strawberry season, I buy several pounds at a time and finish them off in just a few days. I could literally eat them every day and never get tired of them.
It is: I’m not Him.
I'm sorry I haven't written lately, but you see, the reason I write is so that people who live far from us can know what we're doing everyday. That means, when I'm actually home with all those people - I find that it is difficult to carve out the time to write...I'm too busy soaking them up.
wanted to share the beautiful package that arrived for me from Novica. They were so generous to give
"Now then, Captain" he starts, "You have been with Starfleet for some time. "You could take voluntary redundancy. It would save trouble for someone else."
She squealed, "Oh, good! Now we can buy everything! This is GREAT, Mommy!"
Thanks to those who have sent stories in and had them accepted. Your patience is very much appreciated.
Don’t be afraid to share that idea. I can imagine a world where I shared my thoughts without fear of ridicule. I think I could get a lot done. However, does everyone want to hear what I have to say?
Tin Man...America
It was old ground. They had debated this topic a hundred times over and neither would give way or accept the view point of the other. To Laura, Hayley was trying to take away the relationship she had with her daughter; to Hayley, Laura was denying her the right to their true bond by pretending to be someone she was not. They could not both be the child’s mother, not in the way they each so wanted to be; hence there was an impasse, an irrevocable incompatibility between their desires and the truth.
...Patrick J. Kennedy, the former representative from Rhode Island, who donated $35,800 to an Obama re-election fund last fall while seeking administration support for a nonprofit venture, said contributions were simply a part of “how this business works.”
Designer: Goode Huswife
But I am getting ahead of myself.
Even to this great crowd in Jerusalem Paul testified in Acts 22:20 that he consented unto the death of Stephen. He was also guilty of the unpardonable sin. He should not have been forgiven. That is what the Lord said in Matthew.
Noticed that she hardly could walk – but was able to fly quite good. Her feet were paralyzed but not the complete leg. The grip reflex was missing but there was no visible injury. Her plumage was completely well preened, no parasites, no injuries, no swellings, no warm joints. She was well fed, her poop showed white urinates but was a bit too dark green and a bit too soft. Her eyes were clear, her nostrils clean, her cere snow-white. She was perching the whole time, calm, but not puffed up. Looked perfectly content. Her vent was clean, no swelling.
the pig, for though it divides the hoof, it does not chew cud, it is unclean to you. You shall not eat of their flesh nor touch their carcasses; they are unclean to you.
Late summer to fall, which means July onward
In a move that's sure to be a hit with the domesticated animals of Franklin Avenue and their doting owners, Fisher's and Pulp & Bean owner Tony Fisher is planning to open at least one, and maybe two, pet supply stores on Franklin Avenue. Fisher has had a busy fall with the opening of his new coffee shop, but after a much-needed January vacation, he plans to jump back into the always-improving retail scene, first at a space he owns south of Eastern Parkway (near his other family supermarket, the Pioneer) and then potentially at a location north of Eastern. He mentioned that he'd spoken with a few landlords, including the owners of the space next to Bristen's (pictured above).
Beans, beans, they’re good for your … hair?!
I was not allowed to take photos and I did not as I am a rule follower, I am sure there are lots of photos online that I will be able to find. I loved The Farmers Wife (go figure) it was a very different piece then what I was expecting. A reclining farm wife a chicken and the rooster, very interesting indeed. There were quite a few Bronze works; my favourite I
your entry on your blog with a DIRECT LINK back here. Make sure you have
-Cheers!
The group, with the exception of Luke (Russ Tamblyn) – who is set to inherit the house - were chosen because they all experienced supernatural occurrences and exhibit strange psychic tendencies; Theo (Claire Bloom) has ESP, while Eleanor was spooked by a violent poltergeist when she was a young girl: an event she is still in denial of. Time is spent developing the characters and exploring group dynamics before proceedings plunge into outright terror. To begin with, the group, with the exception of Dr Markway (Richard Johnson), are sceptical about the reputed haunting of the house. Markway utilises a scientific approach to his investigation which results in rational explanations offered for the weird occurrences which abound within the walls of Hill House; though he does warn that a closed mind is the worst form of defence against the supernatural. They suggest that as the building is made up of weird angles, doors are hung off centre so appear to close when no one is looking, and draughts contribute to the odd cold spots felt in various rooms and hallways. Dialogue is used to evoke a sense of foreboding too, as talk of phantom dogs, ghostly muttering in the night and the suggestion that whatever stalks throughout the house is actively trying to separate the group, adds to the ominous tone.
﻿﻿﻿Then it made me think of Tangled. I love that movie too. I wish that it was already out on DVD, because I really want to buy it and watch it over and over again because its so funny. I couldn't stop laughing at the part when the really short thug asks the police guy (or what ever he is) "Whats the password?" "What?" "Nope." "Open this door!" "Not even close!" lol and the part when Rapunzel first leaves the tower and she keeps switching between exultant and joyful, and depressed and guilty. "It'll crush her soul?" "Like a grape." That's a good line too haha
The chipboard is a Dusty Attic piece, Vine Flourish, DA0485, its one of my favorite DA pieces. For a fun and different look paint your chippy and then stamp on it. I painted this vintage white and then stamped using a script stamp and pattern stamp with archival ink coffee. I love this effect. The letters are Jillibean Soup corrugated that I slopped some white paint on and then inked with Distress walnut stain.
a pinch or two of sugar
Thyle - Where the campaign will be based. Old seat of Emperors, that fell to a virulent plague a couple of centuries ago. Scions of the old Empire have expressed an interest in 'reclaiming' Thyle, sparking a bit of a land grab.
Not at all.
Okay now that you have the 4 basic definitions now you can understand what angle I am speaking in reference to. However, being a single parent is when the child ONLY lives with 1 parent or guardian, which is usally with the maternal mother.
Anyway, I finally did get my act together, and I made this little memory box with index card filing.
Relationships didn’t last…
Jacqueline Wilson, award-winning children's author who is supporting the special challenge, said: "I've been a bookworm since I was six years old. Books delight, entertain and inform - they're the most magical way of enriching our lives. It's also great fun discovering other worlds and meeting wonderful characters within the pages of a book. I hope children will really enjoy taking part in this challenge - and that a lot of money is raised to support the work of The Children's Trust."
Why bother? Why not put the plates, ourselves, on the strongest foundation possible, the Word of God, His control over chaos, His steadfast love, His faithfulness to all generations? Then they won’t slow down, they won’t wobble, they won’t crash. And even when it seems like they are (just like what was happening when Psalm 89 was written), we can end the same way the Psalmist did with these words – “Blessed be the Lord forever. Amen and Amen.” Ps. 89:52
In the case of Handstands in the Dark, it was Malcolm Hardee’s autobiography and it was written from tape recordings of chats with Malcolm, so I just had to make the words on the page seem as if they came from Malcolm’s mouth. You can’t just write down exactly what people say: people don’t talk in coherent sentences. So I had to reconstruct what he said in a way that made it seem like what he had said. Of course, they were the words he had said on the tapes, but re-arranged for print so that, over-all, it read like what he would have said. They were his rhythms and words re-arranged for print.
Retreat Member – Prepper that a member of a Retreat Group
If you need a break for any reason whatsoever, there is no need to give up altogether. Simply pick up your book, start at the last lesson you learnt. If you feel you haven't mastered it, go back one more lesson, until you reach a lesson/ unit/ chapter that you are confident in. Redo the lessons that you had to move back on.
Just before serving, add in sour cream and parsley.
Six years ago the Wiedemer brothers accurately predicted the crash of 2008 and the end of the housing bubble. The response to this financial crisis by our government has caused ancilliary issues; far greater and more far reaching. The "quantitative easing" (or rampant money printing) has served to ease the pain temporarily, but at a cost of a far greater problem in years to come.
Player Categories + Test
Arriving at the “Greater World” Earthship Community at the welcoming center it was a whole new world. Across the way a team of workers were building the E.V.E. (Earthship Village Ecologies). The team is made up of interns led by experienced Earthship builders. Entering the Welcoming Center you will find a store with books and souvenirs you can purchase along with tours of the community. They have a viewing room where you can watch videos on the Earthship Biotecture process and background.
Sadly, it's these pubs that are shutting down all across the country – the village pubs, the locals on the corners - the community boozer that supplies not only good cheer but also a localized networking system, i.e. a bunch of mates to talk to, all with one thing in common - they're in the pub. The pubs that will survive, like cockroaches in a nuclear winter, will be the unbreakable chains - stacking bottles of WKD high, selling punters short.
But already you see, I am 85,
I'll determine all your fates, a president's what I'd like to be
Everyone, do yourself a favour and instead of Tweeting your every banal, misshaped thought on the Internet and instead of constantly consuming entertainment as if it were an addiction. Stop. Think.
“Beginning today, treat everyone you meet as if they were going to be dead by midnight. Extend to them all the care, kindness and understanding you can muster, and do it with no thought of any reward. Your life will never be the same again.” ~Og Mandino
American Eagle
The National Security Agency was created on November 4, 1952 under Harry S. Truman. For twenty-five years, only the people involved knew of the existence of this secret agency. In fact, the NSA was so secret even the name was classified — most of the people working for the agency didn’t even know the name of the organization that employed them. Now, of course, the NSA is a staple for conspiracy buffs and thriller writers, though the truth is even spookier than fiction.
I was in my local town yesterday and was really pleased to find this LBD party/evening dress-its a Christopher Kane for Topshop limited edition from September 2009 and for £14.99 I had to snap it up from my local British Heart Foundation charity shop.
“Reme.”
Teller Number Two: Circa calle Florida.
Laurel reached down and carefully pinched the bridge of the bleeding man’s nose.
She is colored with Copic's . The papers are from My minds Eye and the fabric behind her is a canvas scallop ribbon that I've stamped on.
You see, more often than not, I'm one of three men on the night shift in the entire hospital. At 6'3" and 270 pounds, it's encumbant upon me to do the compressions. Our ER Physicians are usually male but they are too busy conducting the code and only do chest compressions if absolutely necessary. Security guards are always male but never assist in codes. They are present but uninvolved.
If I choose to be the victim, I will be.
1- Are you human?
Way to go, cheese caves!
“Sutton here that would be the hard case roadblock I warned about. If you look to the left, there is a Chinese restaurant, a dry cleaner and a couple of homes in a diamond-shaped lot. They have managed to get several abandoned vehicles and all kinds of garbage like construction fencing and shopping carts to make a barricade around the block. The hard cases either own or have taken possession of the homes, restaurant, and dry cleaner. The restaurant is a Chinese joint. The dry cleaner was once a drive in burger joint. If we get into a fire fight with these guys, a few rounds of .50 or 20 mike mike into either the restaurant or the homes might discourage them from pursuing further hostile actions.”
Honestly, the trip seems like a 24/7 living hell that I have to experience.
I cut some of the doilies out in the one sheet and added it along with the chip piece. The sticker letters are from my stash.
-We have the education and knowledge to get supports put in place if the
206) a carved wooded cross on my dressing table, reminding me of His love and a dear friend who gave it to me before she left the country
Saravuth Inn crooked his hand over the board and let it hang for a moment. He slapped his knight down and as suddenly, snatched up the enemy pawn.
and I will dwell in the house of the LORD
The sentiment inside reads "...... you can't hide, it's your Birthday!!" and if you lift the leaves up, as demonstrated by my able assistant Hannah (you didn't want to see my nail chewed finger!) you can see Mr Giraffe hiding in the tree.....
Making these steps together is why I'm involved in the Occupy movement. I recalled that my political analysis was not developed over night; rather it took investment from other activists. I've had years of guidance and mentorship within movements for social justice that has gotten me to the place I am today. Now is the time to offer the constructive encouragement to others that was offered to me when I was first becoming politicized.
there for an instant,
I could lie and say that the name Dividers is a reference to the social divide within the "scene" we're in, but the reality is we just thought it was a cool name.
10 bucks got me this cool tasting glass and a chance to try 4 beers. Out of the lineup available when I was there I went with the New Belgium Tart Lychee, Bear Republic Mach 10, Hopaloped (512) Bruin, and New Belgium Eric's Ale.
Confidence is by etymology connected to faith, much more by theology!
Sept. 25th: Denver Rare Beer Tasting, Wynkoop Brewery, Denver, Colo.
“When you or I write a check there must be sufficient funds in our account to cover the check, but when the Federal Reserve writes a check there is no bank deposit on which that check is drawn. When the Federal Reserve writes a check, it is creating money.” – Putting It Simply, Boston Federal Reserve Bank
November...nothing.....December...nothing....January....nothing....February...nothing...March....nothing...April....well, we can't go forever without a cold. Our family of four was able to avoid respiratory illnesses for 6 months! The 6 months when germs are the worst and most prevalent. (Although Tyler and Jeff had a stomach bug once.) So Tyler broke our respiratory wellness streak when he caught a cough/fever. I had my stethescope out several times listening, but he continued to sound good. yeah!
Sarah Allen, "5 Tools to Carry in a Conspiring Universe," to air Monday, May 30th.
An aside--Pod has opera in his blood. His parents are professional musicians, his mother sang opera in Dallas and elsewhere in north Texas, he grew up listening to the Texaco "Live from the Met" radio show on Sundays, plus hearing his mother doing scales and teaching in his home. So he really digs it.
Our over-emphasis on works has taken us far away from the heart of mercy that beats so fervently within our gracious God. Perhaps only listening to our tender Jesus, whispering these sweet, sweet words as He dies alone can we find our way back: “Father, forgive them, for they know not what they do.” And as we hear those words, we realize that we are already are. Back.
Christmas is only a couple of days away and for the first time in 8 years I don’t have to worry about working either side of it. I can fully relax and enjoy myself – and have as much wine with my turkey as I please! I am determined to make this one of the best Christmases I have had in a long time.
SUMMIT AVENUE was published by the small press Coffeehouse Press and it has become one of its biggest sellers. It is now in its third reprint. The author, Mary Sharratt, is now published by Houghton Mifflin with a new book, THE VANISHING POINT coming out in 2006. She has kindly agreed to answer a few questions:
I am blown away by the amount of prayer and support for my baby. I wish each of you knew him like I do. He has taught me so much and I wouldn’t change one thing about my journey. The beautiful thing about him is he is completely happy with the way that he was made and blissfully unaware that he is “different.” That is true, inner joy! He is teaching us such a simple lesson, yet so profound.
Sex divorced from love is an empty, dehumanizing experience. Breasts become weapons of war, not love. They don’t carry the milk of life. They are filled with silicon. Death.
This is its real value. Austin becomes a hub of creatives and engineers (and ad agency people, but not ruinously so) who’ve stockpiled their best ideas and most disruptive business plans for five days of passionate dialogue. There’s a refreshing lack of cynicism and ego, a first-week-of-school feeling to many of the conversations. And trends do pop up: this year it seems several panels emphasized going deeper with content, rather than amassing more bite-size bits. Or taking tech off-screen and putting it to social and civic use. And of course, how big brands are turning into media companies that will eat our lunch/milkshake/smoothie.
The other man had wanted to kill her and drink her blood. This man had saved her. He said he could protect her.
According to Wikipedia, most recently, Laurel Ulrich was recognized as an individual "of distinction ... working on the frontiers of knowledge, and in such a way as to cross the conventional boundaries of the specialties".
Will you be queuing once again outside your local store for the midnight launch? Or are you less excited about the prospect of another Black Ops, preferring the Modern Warfare series instead?
Sometimes an Eagle screaming in the sky, sometimes a Lion
Jenna McClintock and Tina Kay Bohnstedt wander through the colonial San Antonio neighborhood to visit Iglesia de la Merced, with its ornate, gilded altar. A former convent houses the Museo Arqueologico, boasting pre-Colombian, Indian pottery. Jenna views ancient animal-shaped kettles, while Tina describes the skulls, bound and stretched to enlarge the head, believed to bring wisdom. In the busy plaza, the dancers buy maracas and an Ecuadorian painting, before relaxing over beers and borojo fruit, (claimed to be an aphrodisiac)! Nearby, they notice a row of old-fashioned typewriters, and learn that here, locals come to have their official documents typed up.
Jasmine Skins for all your Devices at DecalGirl
WANDA- "Hi Sylvia. How did you die?"
in colour
-Misty upon arriving at Haus Hopper after work on a weekday
Anyway, the big hungry monster in me is mostly quiet, it isn't like I am constantly tortured.
But I figured I'd have it all by the time I retired
This may be our last year with both kids at home. My daughter is considering going to high school next year. At first I was sad and disappointed, but the more I listen to her and her needs, the more excited I get for her. She is making her own choices about her education. She is contacting people at different schools and getting her own information. This will be her decision. She told me, "I have never exeperienced school and it is something out there to be experienced, so why not?" I love this attitdue. Also, I know that our unschooling community is no longer nourishing her or me and it is strange to say this, but public school almost seems more liberating to us right now. (More on this topic in another post.)
She is an angel just like so many blessed kiddos that share that extra little chromosome.
The sapling:
If this sounds like you, then we want you as our Hunger Busting Blogger.
Whether the court of appeals erred in holding that Microsoft’s invalidity defense must be proved by clear and convincing evidence.
Lammas, on the other hand, is a Christian celebration of the first wheat harvest. Farmers would take a loaf of fresh bread made from the current wheat harvest to church to offer as thanks and to ask for a blessing for the rest of the harvest. It was also called the Feast of the First Fruits and celebrated with bread and apples. This may a case of "if you can't beat em, join em" and a way to de-paganize a celebration without causing too much resistance. But this is primarily an Anglo-Saxon tradition and may only be related to Lughnasadh by coincidence. All farming cultures celebrate the harvest and these appear to be two separate celebrations by two different cultures at two different times in history.
Grill chicken until done or bake at 450 for 35-45 minutes. Baste with honey lime mixture during last 10 minutes of cooking.
The media’s job is to pressure the govt of the day….that’s part of the democratic process.
John DeCamp, The Franklin Cover-Up, Child Abuse, Satanism and Murder in Nebraska, AWT Inc, 1992
Click on a thumbnail for a full-screen view.
Set within the industrial city limits of Pittsburgh and its bordering wide, open spaces, Late depicts a woman caught between her relationship with her childhood sweetheart and her blossoming friendship with a woman from her past. When one moves slowly and the other fast, Mary strives to find her rhythm. “I love the concept within the play that Mary articulates, which is, ‘Do you think that two people can experience time at the exact same speed,’” director Margarett Perry notes. “I think that wanting to feel things in the same way that somebody else does indicates that Mary is revving out of control and she’s not able to communicate and really be present with somebody else. Which is also where the concept of ‘late’ comes in – this character is always running late. She wants to be happy where she is, but she’s dissatisfied so she can’t seem to get to where her responsibilities are.”
Here they go again, have the WTO strangle nation-states into submission by lending and retracting agricultural funding.
I decided to make this a challenge in case any other bored people out there might wanna try it. Who knows? So if you don’t mind losing your head for awhile. Go for it. LOL! You can dress anyway you want. It doesn’t even have to be freebies either. I did have to edit my neck a little and if you need to be completely headless go to Library/Body Parts/Alpha Masks and use the Headless Avatar alpha. Viola you’re headless! Please post a comment on this topic so I can see your SL object heads. You can even join and post your images on the Object Heads in Second Life flickr group. Yeah, it’s new. I opened it myself. Yaaaaaay!
Tom: or whiskey
After the stuff at church we went to my dad's office for a birthday party and luncheon. My mom took lots of pictures that I posted to facebook, but they take forever to upload on blogger so here is the most important one.
Ink: Pear Pizzazz, Perfectly Plum, Marina Mist, Versamark.
Tomás Yarrington, a former governor of Tamaulipas state, has been named in a U.S. money-laundering case in which confidential informants for the Drug Enforcement Administration allege that the ex-governor received drug money in exchange for protecting the locally based Gulf drug cartel, according to a criminal complaint.
if you would like to come along with us on our travels.
There’s a lot of shit we don’t say. There’s a lot of shit we shouldn’t be saying. We process information constantly and I for one do not want a running commentary of what everyone thinks of me when they lay eyes on me. I mean let’s face it: how many people a day do you see whom you think wear only nice clothes, you find their personality utterly charming and everything about them is just wonderful? I see a lot of people I may like, or even love, but that doesn’t mean I like their clothes, or hairstyle, or whatever. At the same time I can find it charming because it’s so them, it just doesn’t make it so me.
There had been fears that further nasties might be lurking in the Budget, such as an increase in High Strength Beer Duty, or higher cider duties, but in the event nothing materialised. However, it must be likely that further punitive increases will emerge from the government’s Alcohol Strategy review.
I have quite a number of friends who refer to Valentine's Day as Single Awareness Day, but, even though I'm single, I don't consider it as such. For me, the point of Valentine's Day is your love for other people, not others' love for you. You feel me?
The dressing table is not really a table but a French Provencal commode... The existing green paintwork was in excellent condition when I found it, a touch faded, so mostly anything looks pretty sitting on the top. In pride of place is a vintage hat stand, or hat 'head size' model to be exact and she is wearing a feather collar wrapped across her head with one of my mother's diamonte brooches pinned at the top. I have a collection of leather, porcelain and glass boxes arranged on the top and these I can throw my trinkets in... bracelets, brooches, necklaces... but most of the time I leave them laying out on the top... Accessorising is so much easier if I can see what's what... Besides, I don't know about you, but I seem to get set in my ways and wear the same jewellery for months on end... and then, when the mood strikes, I swap it all up and move onto other pieces... Right now, I am crazy for bracelets... especially the ones that wrap around and around... Truthfully, I have always loved a good bangle...
Of Gibson I have read most of his stuff up to and including Pattern Recognition, and just havent gotten around to his newer stuff. (I am interested in his short stories now thx UMD) Speculative fiction for Gibson pretty well flows out of him. I wont say every book is a diamond, but he does create interesting worlds if nothing else consistently. I like the new direction he took things with Pattern Recognition. Using our present circumstances to ask those lofty questions about the nature of technology and human experience. The philosophical subtext in cyberpunk worlds is something I have always been drawn to, use of the same devices in our world apparently works just as well. Awesome.
I'd like to thank the journal's contributors for the articles, Current Intelligence notes and other contributions which they have made this year. Since so many JIPLP authors are drawn from the ranks of its readers, the journal has an ideal opportunity to let its contents reflect its readers' prime interests and concerns within the very wide field which is intellectual property today. This in turn is reflected in the journal's buoyant level of subscriptions and high rate of renewals -- no mean feat in a period which, if no longer recessionary, is still only in the early stages of recovery.
Pray that we will submit to our Father with humility and awe that He would use even us to fulfill his plans for the ______________________.
Alliances work particularly well in the open-ended round table discussions. If an issue or a point of view is raised by one representative, then supported by others, it will have a much greater impact than if merely mentioned, then forgotten. The official summaries of these meetings will also reflect what issues were highest on the agenda, and since the conclusions reflect a rough consensus of the round table, it is very feasible to prevent dangerous ideas from reaching the summaries.
Mistah and I love North Carolina terribly, but we'd always found ourselves either in Western North Carolina -- in the mountains, and in our beloved Asheville -- or way out there in the East, in the Outer Banks.
Anywho, that is around the corner and for this 4th of July ride...it looked like summer, it felt like summer and by golly~ IT IS SUMMER!
Do I really have to elaborate much on Rocky V? The series hit rock bottom with the film. Sylvester Stallone himself considers it the most ill-conceived, anemic enty into the series. If I am not mistaken, Gene Siskel is the only major movie reviewer to give Rocky V a positive review.
Even in the less successful later books, Sim's imagination and feel for the comic page comes across. The final book, The Last Day, opens with one of the most formally dazzling sequences in comics, as Sim collages in photocopies and draws processes happening on both the cosmic and molecular scale, while seamlessly incorporating dense footnotes and textual effects. That this formal ingenuity is linked to some of Sim's silliest ideas only slightly takes away from its overall impact. These books aren't without their problems in terms of the narrative and ideas, but there are few comics that display more formal panache or sheer visual wonder, and for that alone it deserves a place on this list. Cerebus, at times one of the best comics around, ended in the 2000s, and any list that didn't acknowledge this fact would feel somehow incomplete. [buy] | [buy] | [buy] | [buy]
More content:
So with binder in hand and enough clothes for 5 days we headed out to NYC with a lot of hopes and a ton of excitement!
KueKue
it like a piece of toast too long
You will fly toward someday,
Barn Swallow 32
The sentiment is from MFT. It was one that I just had to pick up. I think it is a wonderful and oh so true :) The paper I think is MME Lime Twist :)
Once you start building up the mileage (runs an hour or longer or thereabouts) you’re into runners nipple territory and a little prep before your runs help big time. Good old Vaseline helps and for me 90% of the time stops it happening. Longer runs just mean more Vaseline. And worst case it doesn’t happen as bad.
Alan Arkin (Four Days in September, Slums of Beverly Hills)
And I’ve spent the rest of the evening cooking a great dinner, preparing my lunches, and basically getting ready for tomorrow.
I think my primary responsibility as a blogger is to deliver engaging original content to my readers, be they one-time visitors or long-time subscribers. To be honest, I am not sure that simply accepting the award, and then giving links to other bloggers, makes the grade. Other bloggers whom I read have received the award, and frankly, the resulting posts aren’t that interesting (especially if they haven’t forwarded the award to me).
Man, these are some freaky dreams. Pretty cool though. Slacktastic, you might say.
For your viewing pleasure, here is the video:
So, I knew this whole word of the year thing was not going to be easy. I knew this was going to be a challenge. But I like a challenge. I think?
The majority of the graves have concrete boxes on top, although small and not practical to hold an adult. I gather they are traditional or symbolic to place above a grave. Many were nameless.
Did get the Lady Catelyn Stark photographed, and two potential ads. Between complaining, did a bit of writing too. All things considered, I've had worse days. Still,now it's time for mandatory rest. Silly human am I.
This type of stuff gets slightly on my tits. A standard product ought to be reliable enough to be standard, with variants clearly branded as extensions. Not a fan of the notion of different ABV’s for the same brands depending on where you drink it. It is piss poor.
Service starts, and things go downhill. Suzy suddenly says they shouldn’t have done lasagna, and Guiseppe is struggling to get pizzas out. Tony quickly follows suit and starts falling behind on burgers. Since he’s being “subpar”, Max decides to go cook up some burgers too, then brings them out on a dirty pan… because us cafeteria dwellers are naturally dirty creatures and won’t care, obviously. Gordon makes them throw those burgers away, and the team quickly runs out of burgers entirely.
Further down Effra Road, crowds began to pour into Currys. Riot police with weapons attempted to push people away from the Tulse Hill end of Effra Road, but were forced to retreat towards Brixton under a hail of paving stones. Three polices vans sped away. For over an hour, a constant stream of plasma screens and other electronic goods were carried out of Currys. There was nothing the police on could do.
I'd add the link of the newspaper article on how awesome our show was, but for some reason, I can't find any ;)
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Line muffin tins (or grease and flour them) and set aside.
MY DEAR SIR GEORGE,
First step is to solder metal strips onto the metal object, to form little compartments, called cloisons.
Ermete Zacconi Les Perles de la Couronne
Ink: Basic Balck, markers
Councilor T. Rooke wants Chief Meara to resign. Councilor Mazza-Moriarty says "we have to work as a team, come together, formulate a plan and most importantly work as a team." Typical teamwork mentality.
LUNCHES
My friends and I were confronted about our affectionate behavior toward each other and asked to stop. We didn’t listen. We didn’t think we needed to. Assumptions were made about us. Conclusions were drawn. No one really asked questions. We were called out publicly.
Now and then I think of all the times you screwed me over
There are so many ways for this experiencing to manifest.
I have since sent an apology and message to Bast, asking forgiveness and another time set aside for the interview. If all goes well, and without gremlins, expect the interview tomorrow.
My first complaint: the service sucked! I have been an X10 fan for nearly 10 years, but this was stupid! I was ready to report them to paypal by the time this gadget showed up!
I started with white cardstock as the background for this layout. Lots of different mists...Fireworks, Perfect Pearls and Glimmer Mist created the color in the background. I used a paper doily in the shape of an egg to stencil the area under the title, "adore".
He mentioned something about giving me a massage once we got home to make it all go away. I told him honestly that thinking about him touching me like that right now was making me a bit disgusted. I told him that I am sorry that I feel that way right now, and that I really don’t want to hurt his feelings. He said that he has no right to get upset, and that I am entitled to my feelings. He said that he can’t argue because it is true – what he did was disgusting. I said just because something is true doesn’t mean he can’t be hurt by it, and that he could also have some feelings. He admitted that he was sad that he did something like that to me.
The large Bluebell is made of sugar. Petals were cut rather thick and rolled out very thinly, to wrap around a large paper cone (see below). Remember the paper hats you made in Kindergarten? Same principle applies here. Make sure to cover the cone with plastic wrap, and dust it liberally with cornstarch to keep the flower from sticking. Allow to dry overnight.
The soul of man has been given wings, and at last he is beginning to fly. He is flying into the rainbow, into the light of hope, into the future, that glorious future that belongs to you, to me and to all of us. Look up. Look up.”
Feb 17 Final Call for Paper Drafts
Mr. Drago Rendl
This may require a class or two.
The standard load for a .50bmg is an 800 grain bullet, that's .50" wide and over 2" long, at around 3000 feet per second, for around 15,000 ftlbs of energy.
Split your dough into 3 sections (I was able to do this by doubling the recipe). Then color your 2 doughs with the colors you want and leave the 3rd the natural color of the dough.
Gordon, Todd (2004). The Return of Vagrancy Law and the Politics of Poverty in Canada. Canadian Review of Social Policy, 54, 34-57.
- lime
I've had a little bit for some time and I've been wanting to do a canvas blackboard for ages so when some of the new Riley blake fabrics came in to work last week I just couldn't help myself!
Still don't know anything else about Dail's brother. Dail has been so busy at work today, I don't know if he has had a chance to find out anything or not. I don't feel free to call as we are not close. I am hoping and praying though that everything is going well.
But you don't have to answer--
This year, as I have mentioned before I have applied to Law Schools in Ontario. The LSAT is mandatory, and is weighed heavily on your acceptance to a law school. I was having mixed feelings about how ready I was for the December testing, although I needed to write the test because it is the last chance to be looked at for September 2011 admission.
These friends are close; one is my dharma brother, though he has completely left the temple. He left for the same reason we all left, but that's another story, one I've told in this blog, one I'm just sick of thinking about, as I float around, semi-teacher-less.
So just to prove to you that I have in fact been sharing the cupcake love, recently I delivered a small batch of Green Tea and Red Velvet Cupcakes to the Pablove Foundation at Dangerbird Records in Silverlake, and the Pablove crew sent over some before and after photos. I'm thinking the 2nd photo is the "Just before the after" photo. (The white globs on the cupcake tray comes from the melted white chocolate used to secure the cupcakes within the box. A little bakers trick!)
Awkward in itself. More awkward when you are not only exposed, but rendered dumb due to your inability to properly communicate. More awkward as for some reason, all the lights when out in the testing room. But since the machine and the (female, thank the lord) technician’s computer were still functioning, we proceeded. In the dark. Which, honestly, was better.
Late on Sunday, as we started to pull together the first real picture of how all the companies stacked up, one of my colleagues, Tod, remarked about Raider and the data we were seeing in front of us. Now Tod only helps me out occasionally, usually online or via email, but he is as sharp as a cactus needle and has the memory of a proverbially elephant.
So what this means to us is we are geez…. one big molecule?? lol, I can sooo see the imagery within me, I really have no context in which to write about it.
P.S Try your local florists for the exotic sounding, tasting and smelling fresh torch ginger flower buds, otherwise they are available frozen from most good Asian grocers. I will be making the duck version soon, so please stay tuned!
Up and down 1st Saddle. Biked to Baseline with snowshoes and poles on my back, which I used for the hike up and down the mountain. Only my third time ever snowshoeing, and it was...interesting. The Kahtoola Flightdecks actually handle impressively well, but they're a pretty small platform. Wore the snowshoes so that I wasn't at all tempted to do any running. Gorgeous evening.
117) plenty of good clothes in my cupboard given to me by my kind cousin and even better...
Once an acquaintance told me how when he was poor the main Christmas present his children would receive was a box of cereal. Each child could go to the store and pick their favorite brand. To this day, he declared, everyone in the family still received a box of cereal under the tree—as a reminder of when they were poor and as a reminder that God befriends the poor. Find some object that represents either a time in your life when you were in deep distress or a place in your life where your “good fortune” is vulnerable today—a stack of bills, a book or toy from childhood, a picture of a loved one who has died. Place the article prominently in your room as an object for meditation and spiritual reflection throughout the week. If you feel as if you are in the midst of deep distress and trouble now, ask God to carry this burden for you. Also, I’d encourage you to ask for prayer from your small group members or from a trusted friend. In your journal entry for this week, reflect on what you learned from this spiritual exercise (400 words minimum).
It is said that MI6’s Mr. Evan’s was tracing the movement of Russian mafia money into Europe as part of project Echelon. He obviously was not following men with suitcases full of money travelling around the World; he would have been tracing the money trail through international banks.
Godfathers of Punk-pop, Buzzcocks will be bringing their inimitable style to GuilFest on Friday 13th July, where they will be headlining the Vive Le Rock Punk and Ska Stage
4) How should I roll?
But name-calling aside, Massimo makes some good points. First, Krauss was wrong in saying that philosophy doesn't progress. It has, not—and Massimo admits this—in the sense that philosophy gets us closer to the truth about nature, because that's not the business of philosophy. Rather, philosophy sharpens its arguments over time, and finds errors with other people's arguments in a way that can inform science (I'm particularly fond of ethical philosophy, at least that part that helps us understand what we really think about morals). Unlike theologians, philosophers don't repeat bad arguments once they're decisively refuted.
The Trade
it seems.
I didn’t bat an eyelid. A bartender learns not to show surprise at anything he hears.
Saturday, March 17, happens to be the 20th business day at the Pizzeria and Public House during which those beers listed for Gravity Head 2012 are being poured. Right now, there are 11, down from a peak of 20 on opening night ... or was it Founders Night? I can't remember, and that's a reminder of how excellent the event has been this year.
He was Babe Ruth, prizefighter Jake (the Raging Bull) LaMotta and Wyatt Earp rolled into one pure undistilled cowboy. He should have been born a century earlier. Spending a few weeks inter- viewing him was like stepping into a dime novel where stark reality and bullshit were soul mates. I enjoyed every minute of it.
I find myself in Lima, Perú. The reason I haven’t left yet is because I have a guest bedroom at a friend’s place.
Also by using drop shadow and outer glow effects
Wednesday: De-grassed and Mulched under River Birch, Finished De-grassing North side of Fruit Garden, Measured out aisles and set four boxes for the Raspberries, and sowed flat of Parks Aurora Yellow Marigold, Signet Starfire Marigold, and the tall Marigolds from Melanie. Don hauled four loads of Donkey Manure-I unloaded.
Upon my return from Cuba, things kicked back into high gear right away with one of my monthly cocktail meetups the following night. I don't blog on my meetups because I don't usually take members to untested cocktail spots. But this months' choice was an exception so I am exceptionally blogging about it. In a bit of a rush to post a location for January's meetup before I left for holiday, I did a bit of internet searching and found Baboto. It looked kind of swank & the prices and size seemed right, so I blindly chose it for the meetup.
Occasionally, you will find a printable coupon in Portable Document Format, or pdf, which will not generate a new barcode for each print. The manufacturer may allow unlimited prints on these, but don’t go crazy just yet. It’s not illegal to print multiples, but some cash registers won’t read them. No need to waste money on paper and ink for hundreds of coupons you can’t use. Try one or two first.
The two of them never spoke.
1 century
THE STUDIO AT WEBSTER HALL 125 EAST 11TH ST AND 4TH AVE NEW YORK CITY
Arguably, The Invincibles squad was not strengthened enough in 2004; understandable in that instance with a strong first XIV and one that stayed relatively fit.
"Don't touch anything!" were my final words.
We continued on making the journey to our destination. Some of us would talk to each other, and for a moment, for a brief moment, there was silence. We probably grew a little tired of talking and walked in silence, until a guy behind me farted followed by his friend’s yell, “Ewwwww!!!” The guy made the trip even more memorable. Haha!
And does this mean that 2012 will not go as quick as last year? Nope, don't think that's going to be case at all do you!!
"I'm going for a drink of water," Ted responded. "Ciel, mes braves! It's très hot in here."
The fact that we still live and still can do ordinary things every day, is a miracle, a wonder.
So Art or Idiocy? is a lot of things. It is a blog full of writing on art, reviews, news, essays, discussions and occassional guest contributions. It is an art project. It is a farce, a satire, not a joke, but filled with jokes. And it is a zine, a magazine, and an online publication bent on artworld domination.
3) Sift flour, baking powder, and salt into mixture and beat until just combined.
message of prosperity and material wealth, it will produce the same in your
Many authors, especially those of ebooks, now engage in blog tours to promote their books. My inspiration/role model is my friend, Gene Doucette, who did a 30-day blog tour for his book, Immortal, earlier this year.
- In a large bowl, combine the flour, sugar, baking powder, baking soda and salt.
1. Make the news with your friends and neighbors.
Naima Coster
“As for you”, said the Pharaoh to the baker, “it’s my unpleasant duty to tell you that your head will shortly be cut off and your headless body hanged from a tree for the birds to eat.”
The feeling I awoke with this morning… is so much bigger, so much fuller than that. It is a movement of energy. A fusing together it you will… of spirit and biology so the separation can cease… and a Unified Energy can live and play on the fields of created matter.
The founding fathers blew it. Our system is flawed. Politicians get rewarded for stealing money from taxpayers and paying off interest groups. They don’t get rewarded any other way. You won’t see a white marble building go up in DC for a politician that gets up and says, “…I DIDN’T do 39 nutty plans that would have cost us 3 trillion dollars. I blocked them. We can’t afford them. I made sure that this government didn’t take that money from you and your kids and spend it with a fire hose in perpetuity”.
The struggles I endure
Exner claimed that she lied to the Church Committee and in her autobiography because she was afraid for her life. Both Giancana and Johnny Roselli had been killed, their murderers never found. Now that she had been diagnosed with breast cancer and it was terminal, Exner felt she needed to come clean. She repeated her story in a 1997 article written by Liz Smith for Vanity Fair, and also to Seymour Hersh for his book The Dark Side of Camelot. She also claimed that she had become pregnant by JFK and had an abortion in early 1963.
Hang on, my ears feel blocked. A quick visit to the bathroom for a cotton bud excavation turns into a long one as I then clean my fingernails and examine my face for new wrinkles and – these are new and now obsessively sought – sun spots. Age spots. Liver spots. Two of the evil splodges have recently appeared and my hooded, sagging eyes are on the alert for more. It used to be that adopting a facial expression of suspicion would eradicate any crows’ feet but now all that happens is that they shift to my forehead and turn my mouth into a child’s drawing of the rays of the sun emerging from a puckered up pencil sharpener. The room echoes with a final duck quack fart as I remind myself to get on with the article due by close of business their time which is, well, an hour in our time and one that I oh-so-confidently assured them I had oodles of experience and knowledge on.
The first two looks are by zero + maria cornejo. I really like the soft fluorescent green cape (surprisingly!) against the soft grey clothes -I like soft colours.
Had all the quiet, polite and deferential people died?
he will stand at the back door and call out to them
The key now was to remove the tape right away... but carefully. I made a couple touch-ups to the edges...but otherwise it came out great.
wonders
Thus, butter, as a concentrated fat, exemplifies the problem that Pollan identifies with processed foods.
Newcastle fan Ashley bought the club in 2007 for a reported £134 million, inheriting a debt of around £65 million, on which the club was paying £6.5 million in interest each year. Ashley has now wiped this debt out, reduced the interest the Club pay’s on it borrowings to just over £200,000 a year and has increased the Club’s turnover by 69% in his five years in charge.
Official Blurb
Oh, but all that doesn't make it easy to follow God past so many of our assumptions and expectations!
Thanks Jenny if you see this.
welcomed me
It's Wednesday, so I'm sure you all know what that means, yes it's the Headbanger Challenge!
04. Dolce Luce
Deeper still something waits
Yet pundits are betting that Parliament will be dissolved anytime between May 16 to May 23 and balloting to take place between June 9 to June 18.
In Dean Koontz’s revisioning of the story, Victor was incapable of repentance, being an egomaniac with delusions of grandeur.
You are allowed to add 3 links to your shops or your blog.
does he live here
Abry Jones 3 tackles, 2 sacks
the Shell I was has become my crutch ….and now it’s part of me
Except.
E.T.: THE EXTRA-TERRESTRIAL (John Williams)
An ambulance flew by us so everyone pulled off the shoulder as much as possible.
You brought home from dime stores.
Talaga?
Lots of great merchandise to swag in the Main Hall Solution Expo. I am talking mugs, key rings, USB stickes, stress balls, bags, pens etc … but my two favourites … so far (as eachday brings new discoveries)…
Our privileged lives lull us into a sense of complacent security that is rarely disrupted from day to day. Take a moment to count your blessings today. I’m sure the miners will be counting theirs along with you.
Love Is Expensive And Free -- Fastball
- Donald Duck comics were once banned in Finland because he never wore pants.
The evidence is compelling to indict Dick Cheney and Condoleeza Rice guilty of conspiring to intentionally allow the 9/11 attacks to occur.
This next review is my first from the Lost Coast Brewery from Eureka California. I wasn’t quite sure why I picked it up, but when I was in O’hares liquor store it basically jumped into my basket. How could I say no. This India Pale Ale is unfiltered and (as they put it on the bottle) “Radically hopped to give it an intense spiritual aroma”.
because the person dies.
I couldn't really talk to my psychiatrist about the abuse until my symptoms were under control and even then I was hesitant...but she had already helped me so much that I hoped she could help me with "IT."
The delicious ridge gourd mint chutney is ready to serve!!
And travel the world
(6png@ 300ppi)
"Oh that's okay," I said. "I'll wait." Then I threw in a sweet smile just for the fun of it.
Joe fingers carr - Istanbul (not constantinople)
I saw chopsticks for all occasions: plain wood ones for everyday, lacquered ones for fancier fare, and precious silver ones for heirloom pieces. Really beautiful items! I now regret not buying a couple of sets. You never know when you want to serve a fancy Chinese dinner.
It's that insanely busy time of the year where freelancers are trying to make enough money to get through December and January, when the industry goes dead for two months. This means I've been working every hour that is sent and still struggling to fit everything in. Hence the lack of blogging.
Ferguson admits that the security industry has not done itself any favours in the past. Certain companies have relied on marketing through what is known as FUD (fear uncertainty, doubt) where those companies preyed on the fear of customers who didn’t really understand what the threat was.
And everyone knows that murderers and tyrants are terrible at science! So, if they believe something, it necessarily follows that that belief is false.
Here are the prom pictures I had promised you! Maddy is wearing the dress that she had hand painted and I sewed for her and have teased you all with over the course of the last several weeks.
-Lemon juice
My intention was to write to thank you for being part of our first contest and solicit suggestions for
In Recife all the guys do it, in the summer you’ll do it too,
We owe it to our kids to give them the best start in life so let's give them a chemical-free life. Choose BPA-free products where you can. Look around your kitchen and see how much plastic you have and what you can get rid of to reduce their exposure. If you were like me, you have draws and cupboards full of plastic ware. I've made the change over slowly as I know it can be expensive. But each time you get rid of a plastic item and replace it with a BPA-free option, you are making a healthy change.
And you know, advice from a whole lot of good people over the years has been perfect: Get onto it, if you want to write something, write something that E@L would write, write like you do in your blog. Obviously that is your voice, they'd say.
My son stayed for most of the brew and helped out. While brewing, I also did a lot of other stuff during the "down times" of mashing and brewing. So much for just relaxing! I racked 10-gallons of my brown ale (finally) from the tertiary fermenter to kegs. It will be fully carbonated and ready to try, by this evening. I also installed some new outdoor lighting, did 3 loads of laundry, and some other yard chores. So when my wife came out to nag me and to try to make me feel guilty for "loafing around" all afternoon, I had the moral high ground. I didn't argue, or even let her know what I had completed; (I let her figure that out later). Instead, I casually dispensed an IPA from a keg in my garage fridge, sat down, smiled, and lit a big Fonseca cigar. She disappeared in disgust. My son and I clinked glasses. Mission accomplished!
I had never heard of a burn pile until I moved to the country. It is an unfortunate solution to controlled land-clearing. When tree clippings and other land waste cannot be turned into useful garden additives, they are piled together to be burned, like a bonfire, in the wet season. The process is fairy petroleum intensive and pollutant-based, as most people use a few gallons of gasoline to get the pile going and many piles don’t strictly contain the authorized components.
Max Tomlinson, the then media adviser to Liberal National Party Senator Ian Macdonald, wrote to Dr Carole Ford after she penned a newspaper column criticising the lack of female representation in Queensland's parliament.
It’s time to rethink the Predator, people. Warrior-nobility aside, we’ve been casting them as the badguy. And I’m not sure that stands up. Walk with me:
A MacArthur funded study was just released regarding the activities kids are involved in online. It’s an interesting read for all educators and parents. They conclude that the “hanging out”, “messing around”, and “geeking out” that kids do online helps students gain media literacies and skills they will need to fully participate in the 21st Century society. Here’s a quote from the summary of the report:
A life full of bruises, sweat, and blood is worth living.
Third Phase "Adjustment or at-ease Phase."
* the promise of edible ribbons coated with local mountain herbs,
Adhere to renovation guidelines, says council – by Faizal Nor Izham – Tuesday, January 31, 2012 – 20:44
My daughter performed at the Relay for Life this morning. She was in two performances, costume change and all. I think she has been on stage more times in her mere 5 years than I have been in my entire life. She loves it and is quite a ham on stage. Here you go.....
We may on some occasions of course wish to translate 'x is good' as 'x is something that all men on all occasions would desire if they had full knowledge of its consequences for them' -- in which case it is an empirical statement normally requiring proof. On many occasions, however, it is accurately translatable only as 'I like x' or 'I have been taught to like x' or 'x will get me what I want'. The similarity in form between the two sentences 'x is good' and 'x is pink' does not on reflection deceive us into thinking that both are empirical propositions about something outside ourselves. In saying 'x is good' we tell something about ourselves (i.e. our policy beliefs or preferences) only.
3. Casting on is NOT a fishing metaphor.
Ever since my 3rd grade spider trumpet performance, I've always found excuses to avoid performing in front of audiences. But, knowing I'd regret it if I didn't, I went to the audition - the room, of course, packed full of women. And, to my surprise, ran in to an adorable MTF friend of mine there, who has apparently performed the They Tried to Beat the Girl Out of my Boy monologue in past performances.
Disclaimer: I am not being swayed by anyone to promote or "endorse" the products below. This is how I use my own money to use the technology available today meeting my own personal needs.
I decided to link up and share a few things about myself:
2) Some men are not blessed with great skin and age faster than others, a little color helps.
Chicken growers own their land, buildings, and equipment, and all of the debt and risk that go with them, but these entrepreneurs have no real control over their economic lives. Growers buy their chicks and feed from their poultry processor, for example, and processors often require growers to make new investments in buildings and equipment. The processors, Mr. Lynn seems to suggest, have something much better than mere capital: the economic power to dictate how others use theirs.
looks great against the grey, even better against the blue
Having just picked up Barrowmaze and read it in a cursory fashion, I thought it would be fun to run as a rather leisurely pbp. If you are interested, the link is above. No number of players is too many, I should think, but if there are fewer than four people interested, I'll probably give it a pass.
Anna Paquin is one hot mama-to-be!
2 tsp freshly squeezed lemon juice
President Obama has governed at a time of America high unemployment, low GDP growth, inflation on the rise for consumer goods, falling housing prices, a stalled housing market, home foreclosures and bankruptcies at record levels, high gas prices, 3 wars, and a government that spends too much and takes in too little.
Egypt
A few years ago Poor-Mom had the opportunity to work a second job temporarily. Close to home. Graveyard. There was no one to stay overnight with the kids, but it was dollars, so she went for it. At the end of the month she had amassed the gigantic extra fortune of 936.00 and bought ‘Brownie’, the sadistic pile of crap presently located at the end of her street where earlier in the evening it decided it didn’t feel like going the remaining two blocks home.
So what's the big deal? Why is sex outside of marriage wrong?
What would the consequences be?
James Corrigan, 60, New York, N.Y.
In the movie, Katniss is shown picking the flowers and placing them around Rue. Then she puts up a hand sign, one that had been shown by her people after she volunteered as tribute, rather than giving the expected applause. It seems to be a sign of solemn respect, one that recognizes that something is wrong with the way things are being done here. The movie cuts away to a scene of the people of District 11 watching her, giving the sign back, and then starting an open rebellion. This (I believe) is the foreshadowing of what will happen in the next installment. General Snow is pondering what to do with her, and this is when Haymitch pulls strings to persuade him to let her live.
Midnight On Murder Mile
Giving up my search, I back away from the window and nearly trip over my luggage. It is lying on the ground at the foot of my queen sized bed, stuffed to busting with clothing, half of which I probably will not wear. I was stupid to have packed that much. He had told me so, but I didn't care. I just needed to get away. Away from the familiar, away from the stress, from the work, the everyday, mundane activities that were slowly eating away at my very soul. It was all too much.
I skipped yesterdays workout... Day 3... because I was tired! I ended up sleeping until 10 (obvi I woke up to get Mikayla on the bus) and it just made me more exhausted, so I decided to "workout later that night". Of course that never happened. Who wants to work out at night? Not me.
Here's a few inspirational photos to tide you over until I return.
Once upon a time not too many weeks ago I peeked out and my basket full of BAGELS added up to 24 or so. Since hitting that peek number, I've been making more wrong predictions than a weatherman.
One million pull tabs end to end would stretch 16.75 miles. A million pull tabs calculates to about 789.27 pounds. A million of anything is something to celebrate, and we thank you, Lee Middle School, Derby Middle School, Ms. Cline, and your wonderful children for this amazing feat!
“World War I created for the Turks a condition of total war. In short it created an armed and mobilized society, a heightened sense of national security crisis, a deepened xenophobia, and the sense of chaos that accompanies a war. Total war was a political, military, and cultural space in which genocide could occur. All these conditions were used to mobilize the ‘final solution’ for the Armenians.” (The Burning Tigris, Pg 166).
The Likud would have 31 seats in the next Knesset, with Kadima dropping from largest to fifth-largest faction at only 10 seats, a Dahaf Institute poll sponsored by the Knesset Channel showed Wednesday.
“Humph. Then tonight you shall be learning to set a tent up. Remove it from the pack please.”
Charles R. Ambroselli, CPA, CFP®, is the founder and pastor of Kingdom at Mount Zion Family Church in Marietta, Georgia, and is the proud father of three beautiful girls. He is a certified financial planner, a certified public accountant, and a Qualified Kingdom Advisor™. Charles earned a bachelor’s and a master’s degree in business administration from Saint Bonaventure University. Both degrees are concentrated in accounting and finance. Currently, Ambroselli is a doctoral student at Christian Leadership University. He also has completed academic programs at the College for Financial Planning and at the Christian Living Bible Institute.
1 brave
heart today. It produces in my life everything that it talks about and
Today we have agencies like this. They are agencies for people who don’t like advertising.
The United States of America is a representative form of Democracy that is a Constitutionally bound Federal Rpeublic. Each Comonwealth, Dominion, District, and State are Constitutionally bound representative democracies. Each Natural born Citizen is a Sovereign individual by right of birth from parents who are U.S. Citizens. U.S. Citizenship is comprised of three catagories which are determined by the method under which thier citzenship was established.
I told the kids about the origins of my new milkshake line—
- 5-Point Harness
Communication and discussion are even more critical in a world where we seem to be connected all the time—in the classroom or the workplace, on our smartphone and computers, on Facebook or Twitter or blogs like this. Communication is one of the 21st-century skills we often mention in the context of independent schools. In addition to the in-person, our students must learn how to navigate virtual conversations and situations when their tone (or humor or sarcasm) cannot be detected. As NAIS President Pat Bassett wrote in his blog, “While many believe we shouldn’t worry so much about kids, the ‘digital natives,’ regarding technological skills, in fact this form of communication needs more attention than many other issues, since it’s so relatively new, so hard to monitor, and so difficult to fix if there’s a misstep.”
2. Add vanilla and egg. Mix well.
Seeing your kid get hurt is about the most horrifying thing in the world, especially for a new parent. Being the cause of a child’s pain will cause many parents to beat themselves up. It is good that you don’t want to hurt your child, just don’t take it too far. The last thing you want is to raise a child that is afraid of the world.
“I PROMISE YOU NOTHING!”
The other part of me secretly wondered what time of day might be best. Just when might no one notice a forty-something woman putting down her purse, taking off her shoes, and slipping under the center of the very back pew?
Zakeri F, Assaei RG. Cytogenetic monitoring of personnel working in angiography laboratories in Iran hospitals. Mutation Research 2004; 562: 1-9.
Non-Related Political Point:
But where do you start? Well, you've started already.... just by thinking about it you got your brain moving, gearing up for new things, opening itself up to this experience....
It is these mainstream, but more flavorful and interesting beers that are stealing the market share from macro brewers, not experimental orange peel-ginger-ginko beer. Interestingly, instead of really committing to making reasonable competitors to these beers, they choose to identify the hard liquor manufacturers as the competition.
Grandpa’s father moved to this country when he was 16 years old with no English or money. His son, Martin, grew up during the Depression and the Second World War. When we think on how he worked his way out of the poverty he was born into and went on to build a prosperous egg business, send 4 children to college, be actively involved in local and national government issues, travel to six continents with Peace Corps helping the less fortunate, we’re overwhelmed by his insatiable need to make people’s lives better regardless of the sacrifice that is might entail.
Here's a look:
You weren’t born a noble?
2000 and whose name means ‘My Kid’, had just one run in his native France, finishing second in a Flat race at Pontivy in Brittany. His trainer Venetia Williams then purchased the horse and later passed him on to Vida Bingham. Mon Mome’s first outing in the UK was in a decent novices’ hurdle at Newbury in December, 2004, when he finished seventh of 12. The horse had six further races in the 2004-2005 season, all novices’ or maiden hurdles, without breaking his duck, doing best in two races at Fontwell when third and second. Mon Mome unseated his rider at the third fence on his chase debut at Cheltenham in October, 2005, but put that incident behind him and set about compiling an impressive sequence of results. In his next seven races, Mon Mome registered four wins and three seconds before unseating his jockey in the Scottish National at Ayr. Consistency was the name of the game in
To be continued ….
The US wasn't alone; the European economies had already started to fall. The Vienna Stock Exchange collapsed in May 1873, and this spread to the new German Reich in the Gründerkrach ("Founder's Crash), and thence to a France already struggling to pay the Indemnity imposed by the victorious Germans after teh Franco-Prussian War. Europe's economies tanked.
Manhattan Beach, CA. The
We currently have a ‘tigertastic’ amount of 62,000 campaign sign ups and signatures on our petition www.bantigertrade.com!
Whatever happened to the discreet dab of fragrance on the wrists, or the delicate touch at the throat and behind the ears that gave a woman that certain understated elegance and je ne sais quoi? At what point did women come to believe they must shower in the fragrance in order to be noticed? And do they never stop to think of the battles being fought in the air around them between their own fragrance and those, different fragrances, of their companions – not to mention the ambush of innocent bystanders in the vicinity? Wasn’t there a perfume at one time called “Ambush”? How apropos!
So, anyway, I will gather my thoughts, get my head together, and you know, prepare you gently for the inevitable slide show(s) - plural.
Day 3 - Feb 3
-stress
That was what someone once wrote, long ago, in graffiti on the wall of the post office on Spring Street, in NY's Soho, when I was working for the most talented (and very cute) animator, doing the early MTV animations. I'd pass it and it felt like the Word of God.
-Reviews of "green products"
and rest.
He denied the accusations but was arrested and an investigation is being conducted as he serves a pre-trial detention, a law that has been under criticism as it allows the public prosecution to keep one in detention for weeks without access to trial. He said that his account has been hacked and that he is a religious person who would never insult the Prophet.
I am not a gambler but Las Vegas is one of my favorite places to visit. It is also a wonderful jumping-off point to the National Parks in Utah and Arizona. (For myself, it’s cheaper to fly in and out of Vegas.)
Why aikido? To be honest I’m not sure. For about two years now I’ve had a nagging suspicion that there may be more about this martial art than meets the eye. I also have to admit that Mokuren Dojo and American Traditional have both influenced this choice. The former blog I’ve followed for years and the later is relatively new.
The Fuel Pump
According to the chapel’s strike blog, following a successful day of negotiations, Tindle has agreed to reverse its policy of non-replacement agreeing to a six month moratorium on present staffing levels – guaranteeing that if anyone in editorial leaves over this period they will be replaced. They have also agreed an extra reporter to work for half the week to help out with the current workload. The situation after six months will then be reviewed. Redundancy consultation notices issued to staff on the eve of their first walk out have been withdrawn.
Antivirus support, Registry cleaner,Microsoft office support, Remote tech support, any troubleshooting
5. What is your dad’s name?
With a suitcase full of supplies, I’m finally ready for my big excursion. I am Haiti-bound.
I realised that was not the correct thing to say and began to explain that I’d just been to the Opera House drinking lots of different beers – that wasn’t good, either. As we began to make mental plans to continue the night elsewhere I stumbled over the secret password. “Let me explain. We were at the Opera House for the Beer Diva’s ...”
deceive their obverse truths).
I know I have a lot of Seasonal Depression suffering readers that have been waiting for my report back on my light therapy.
And even if you can sprint a million times faster than me (and you probably can), I’ll eventually catch up.
Surgery next week.
Tiger's infection has taken quite a toll on his body, making him feel more lethargic than usual these days. However, instead of feeling defeated by this nasty virus (or whatever it is that is causing the infection), we have decided to learn more about the antibiotics that Tiger has taken, penicillin:
Bringing It Down: Bottlenecks and Levers
For three years the disciples were learning how to obey; what to obey; whom to obey. Now the Lord had died on the Roman cross fulfilling what He said would happen. But now He was again speaking with the disciples, commanding them, instructing them. He said earlier in Matthew16:21that He would be raised again the third day. This had come to pass. Now we will read the command of the risen Lord in Acts 1:4:
Sometimes you can tell what the kids did on the weekends . . . And how their parents felt about it.
I love taking pictures.
As for the new Strategic Partnership Agreement that promises we will do, um, something TBD in Afghanistan through 2024, it doesn’t say anything about how many forces we will provide or how much money we will spend. It just says we won’t have permanent bases or soldiers on patrol after 2014, something many of us would like to see happen even sooner.
NOTE: the giveaway is now closed!!! Thanks to all who entered - all your suggestions are awesome!!! I'll announce the winner as soon as I go through all the entries :) Niki*
Ladies Class III (Emily)
We say we believe in freedom but bring people into “righteous” bondage.
This attitude has some clear application outside of the social context that we need to note. Careful attention to the similarities between one situation and the next is the basis for distinguishing when the situation has changed in a way that might be dangerous (e.g., “these berries were red last I ate them, but greenish now”). Focused on perceiving rather than judging, this fosters a conservative attitude (e.g., “They weren’t green last time, I won’t eat them green”), but that is often a very good approach to take.
I fell in love with Tasmania, I truly did. So much of it is still untouched, there are still vast rolling properties and a world heritage area on this tiny island. I want a house here – a quiet escape, a beautiful view, lots of land and no TV. We fantasised the whole trip about buying 20 acres of rolling pasture by the ocean, and putting a caravan on it, until we had enough money, where the house I was already designing in my head could be built. And then I found it! While browsing HabitusLiving.com, I found somebody had built my dream house in my dream
Yes sweetie, right after I wake up.
Well, their wedding has a summery, picnic feel, so we decided to tie the shower into the theme with some bright reds, oranges, yellows. Think watermelons and lemonade. Add in some mason jars, poppies, angel food cake, and strawberries, and there it is. Winner winner, chicken dinner!
Kindles for Kids is my way of paying it forward. My goal is to raise enough funds to purchase 10 Kindle Fires for the pediatric unit of a local hospital in UT.
Testament’s glorious ministry telling even more of the fullness of His Glory
Today was such a promising day. It started out beautifully. Not a cloud in the sky. The the clouds rolled in, just a light coating; it wasn’t too tough for the sun to burn through if it had such a mind to. Then it got windy. The clouds turned dark and ominous. It sprinkled. Then the sun broke through. And so it continued both day and night…
Books make me happy-er and I had some fun looking at and reading
LT: Do you think the Queens Hall one will be good?
He's a smart one though because he figured out how and where to turn the water on. I kept turning it off (there's only so much flooding my lawn can take) and he kept running over to try to turn it back on.
Text Added April 18th 2010:
All of these a few elements include the identical function eventhough HSDPA is the the majority advanced of the. Many of us need both a single for these functions to build related on the world wide web at cellular mobile phone. Absolutely yes, browsing the web is just about the reasons so why individuals plan to employ a offer smartphone. We tend to travel over the internet at mobile to make sure you verify e-mail addresses, read through blogging not to mention meet up with friends and family plus friends by social network.
i feel bad for this guy, i don't know what he's called but he catches the ball (errr so he's a catcher?). Anyway, I feel bad for him because he was the one near the audience. There was this one time, he wasn't able to catch the ball that a Dodger batter hit. And the rest of the audience were like booiing and teasing him. lol. That's so embarrassing. If he was able to catch it then the booing wouldn't really make it look bad Right?
Her older sister Clara married Moreton Frewen and the youngest sister, Leonie, married Sir John Leslie.
On Lincoln’s Birthday Saturday, we honored perhaps our greatest president by running some chores and perhaps watching a basketball game. These have become the customary methods of observance, since a large majority of Americans probably didn’t even notice the occasion. “But I watched the Ohio State-Wisconsin game because basketball players are tall, as was Lincoln,” you might protest. You’d be lying, something Honest Abe wouldn’t stand for.
Maybe a pup will fit in there ;)
This was the first classical LP I ever owned. I found it in the trunk of a Volvo I was repairing for a friend. I played it so much that I eventually had to buy another copy, which I sold in my record purge of 2005. This copy was a thrift shop find (99¢), in good condition.
But, where is this choice-making power supposed to come from? How does power get distributed, how do some of us pour ourselves a bowl of cereal like it's nothing, and how do others (like my friend) forget to eat for days?
“But that’s like calling Don Quixote a novel.”
That’s my girls! :)
And a prescription for something called a “Rescue Inhaler”
Thought, when it is complete, is action. The man who, in order to think, withdraws from the daily contact with life, makes his life unnatural; for him life is confusion. Our very seeking for God or truth is an escape. We seek because we find that the life we live is ugly, monstrous. You say, “If I can understand who created this thing, I shall understand the creation; I shall withdraw from this and go to that.” But if, instead of withdrawing, you tried to understand the cause of confusion in the very confusion itself, then your finding out, your discovery, would destroy the thing that is false.
3DO. A name that is synonymous with crappy games staring the Army Men figures. Back in December of 1999, my friends and I rented two N64 games. One of them was Army Men: Sarge's Heroes. Sweet merciful heavens, that game was awful! For the most part, I'd managed to avoid disastrous N64 releases but not that time. Just thinking about that turd of a game makes me shudder. The other game we rented was BattleTanx, which turned out to be decent. We had some fun driving around in tanks killing each other. Then we played on Area 51 and that track was forever stuck in my brain. It's so militaristic and pumping. If I can get a little serious here, listening to this track again got me thinking just how hard life must be on the battlefield for all those soldiers out there fighting. Those men and women stare death in the face everyday Just something to think about.
I'm not a big fan of the picture frames just chilling on top, but that is a project for another day. Suggestions? I was thinking maybe an over sized serving tray or something. This was a ZERO cost makeover, as I already had the baskets. Gotta love that.
The Building Excellence in Science and Technology Program (BEST)is an innovative pre-college enrichment program based at New York University for talented high school students that encourages the presence of historically under-represented groups in science, technology, engineering, math (STEM careers).
If it were truly purely doctrinal, as with the Nazis and the Communists, the violence and the rancour would never reach such high levels. That is, it was all about power in the case of the Nazis and the Commies; just as it is all about power when it comes to the battles between the commies and the Trots (the SWP, etc.) today. (Actually, Workers Liberty and the SWP are both Trotskyist groups, which shows us how narrow the doctrinal positions must be. It also shows us how fierce the battles can be between even tiny groups vying for the same political or social space.) After all, no one fights over the correct answer to a difficult equation, or over the exact date when Napoleon died. Nor even over past or present ideological or philosophical differences that have no political, social or moral import today. Perhaps Foucault was right. It’s all about ‘the will to power’. All the rest is simply window dressing, at least in our cases of the Commies and the Nazis, as well as the SWP and the Commies (along with Workers Liberty).
“Somehow,” Trent replied, playing with the finger “that did in fact happen.” He laughed again and pocketed the finger again. He pointed at Geoff, still laughing. “It seems like you owe me a date”.
Here are the curtains and tablecloth I made last year for my dining room. I still have not made my chair cushions though, they are going to be yellow. Maybe after I finish this birdhouse quilt. I picked up my mouse pad and arm rest at a yard sale for $1 and they match perfect! To read more about my curtains and tablecloth go here: http://missyscakesandaprons.blogspot.com/2011/02/my-life.html
I became brave enough to bend, allowing my face within eyesight range, and I searched every centimeter of the top of that towel before declaring it clear of enemy presence. Then with my fingertips again, just as quickly and just as gently, I flipped the towel and examined the other side.
Most Brits think it's an activity best learned behind closed doors.
"The Lord is not slow in keeping His promise,
One day soon we will go for dinner.
My fondest memories during my childhood consisted of my father and I going to the main branch of our public library here in Lafayette and reading everything and anything I had interest in. At 10 years old, I was reading the works of Langston Hughes and Zora Neale Hurston. They quickly became my two favorite writers. As I progressed in age, I wish I was born during the Harlem Renaissance. I would be a poetess traveling and writing poems about the countries and the people who I visited to a Jazzy tune. The memories of my imagination also remind me of when I fell in love with Librarians and two in particular, who molded and shaped my life forever.
This is a small portrait of my Dad painted in oils on a canvas board. Its going to be a gift for him as he has just started drawing again at the grand age of 76 which just goes to prove its never too late! I remember him drawing people and faces when I was just a kid so it makes me so happy to see him finally pick up the pencil again!
But he doesn't. This is a kid's book.
Well, in search of the ELUSIVE ELK we had a pleasant lunch looking over a bird sanctuary, stopped at some Antique stores and found a couple of things to bring home....nothing of which I was actually looking for, but what the hey! The ELK, well, they are safe and sound wherever they must of been hiding....behind that TREE, saying look at the stupid HUMANS looking for us!! Also went to the Victoria Flea Market on Sunday (had never been before), also found lots of stuff we weren't actually looking for....I am searching for (besides the ELK), a fireplace mantle to make into a headboard! Didn't have any luck there, but came home with an exquisite teacup and saucer, some antique plates for 2 dollars a piece, a scouting painting that my hubster had to have, some wild mushrooms that some guy had picked up in the area where we were looking for the ELUSIVE ELK! Had a lovely dinner with our son Matt and his girlfriend in their new home to celebrate the hubsters upcoming birthday which he will not be home for! All in all besides the NON-EXISTANT-ELUSIVE-ELK, we had a good time! Just three more weeks until the next adventure.......searching for the ELUSIVE SANTA!!
There are dark characters as well who go between being bad and good through the story like Snape, Draco, Peter and few others. I normally do not like these dark characters but in the end it is the Snape that impresses me most. He is one of the most misunderstood character who gave everything for the love of his life. His character really shows what remorse can do to a bad person.
Inside the medieval center we found the greatest surprise a girl could ask for… A CHOCOLATE FESTIVAL! We spent a lot of time there eating, looking at the amazing art these people made with chocolate alone. The picture below shows a box of “crafting supplies” made completely of chocolates. It was so impressive.
Donald McCain Jnr (Cholmondeley, Cheshire)
God wants us to be happy, healthy, and prosperous. But He wants us to trust in Him more! If we try to do things all of our own accord, we are turning our back on Him! How do you feel when someone turns their back on you? Think about that for a minute. That is how God feels when we turn our backs on Him, yet He is ready, willing, and able to FORGIVE us! All we have to do is repent. Ask His forgiveness and do our very best to not repeat the same mistakes!!
4. A religion must be in accord with basic human rights.
Father returns and says, “well Jack,
26. Emanuelle's theme (01:32)
Three pounds of cheap polish sausage.
2) Organizers continuing to acquiesce to these people's demands, continuing a never ending vicious circle. Why should they honor the requests of people who have no idea what a milonga should be? To keep them coming to the milonga and make it profitable? I believe tango should be above money and profits... On the long run, chasing the money has made this community stagnate.
Buy one for yourself; buy one as a gift — or more; there’s no limit!
10 Water in the Sky
These abstractions from the Divine Personality invite certain issues. The person who hears that “God is Love” may rightly ask, if that is the case, why there is such a place as Hell. The person who hears that “God is All-Powerful” may rightly be puzzled by the question, “If He is All-Powerful, could he create a stone too heavy for He Himself to lift?” And the person who hears that “God is Father” may rightly feel, drawing from his or her own experience of fatherhood, that if this is the case he wishes for nothing to do with such a God.
I’d like to mention here that I’m not trying to slight the friends who’ve been with me for a while, but because I received these awards during the challenge I thought it was only fair to pass them on to new friends I’ve discovered through the challenge.
Match the set of nicknames with the name-giver.
It is said that a diplomat is a man who thinks twice and says nothing. Our Health Babus think twice and talk a thousand times. They seem to forget that words have to be translated into deeds if a climate of trust and confidence is to be created and fostered.
This proposed method is an extension of outlining your writing, so be sure to outline your work if you haven’t already. Once your writing is outlined as you see fit, find some notecards, and write each segment of the outline on a separate notecard. Now shuffle them.
Was so tired last night that I had to go to bed at 7:30. Not depressed tired, just felt like I didn't go to sleep, I would fall down where I stood. I didn't feel good yet I have no symptoms that I was aware of. As a result, I woke up at 3:30 and got on the computer. Had to decide if I wanted to stay up or go back to bed. Why I don't go back to bed, I don't understand. I know that would be best. Perhaps I just had to get my nightmares out of my head. Doesn't matter as when I went back to bed I ended up with even worst nightmares. I am tired. It seems as though the nightmares make me even more tired. Is that possible?
For some reason, this hour felt a little… cluttered to me. We had three patients beyond the Amelia visit and we also had Owen and Cristina’s marital woes. I feel like one of the patient storylines (and the lesson learned with it) could have been saved for another episode. But let’s cover what went down, and then let me know what your TwoCents are!
Nine-year-old Nicholas Benedict has more problems than most children his age. Not only is he an orphan with an unfortunate noes, but he also has narcolepsy, a condition that gives him terrible nightmares and makes him fall asleep at the worst possible moments.
Mr Hockey said that amounted to an extra $1000 a year in tax for taxpayers.
This skirt was an entirely different shape when I bought it. While preparing for this remix, I got a bug up my butt to turn this skirt (terrible photo - don't judge) into a pencil skirt. I even repositioned the side zipper... not very well, though, which is why I'm wearing a cardigan. To hide "the bump." I need to figure out how to fix that...
Usually I would plant them in the pot that they would end up in, but since I have no idea which seeds are what anymore (see previous post for details) I planted them in smaller containers and will transplant them when (I’m using positive thinking here) they grow big.
I think I've told this story already. Damn, I was drunk when I wrote the list.
A day workshop at INLOGOV on 6 July will present a balanced picture and facilitate a discussion of the pros and cons of making the change and the detail issues that need to be taken into account in any new constitution. Several of the councils making the change will be represented or make presentations. Ed Hammond, the researcher who wrote the Centre for Public Scrutiny report, will speak. There will be comment from the Local Government Association, and support from FOSIG, the group that represents fourth option councils.
All in all it was a wonderful, but very busy day.
It wasn't quite the week we'd planned, however, because A got laid out by the plague on Thursday night. He who never admits to being ill (it's always 'allergies') and who, swear to god, once came home from a construction job missing a toenail and only noticed when I pointed it out, came home from work early on Friday and slept for three days in self-imposed quarantine. He even broke out our stash of hospital masks from Baz's NICU stay.
Joker Record - JRR-001SUN
Bearing it crushed and mystified.
Glad to do my friends a favor
Now, about my job. Sometimes in life you are presented with opportunities that don’t come around very often. Taking these opportunities requires a little faith, and a little confidence in yourself. The easy thing is often to do nothing, but you know what they say…nothing ventured, nothing gained. So, I left my firm (with a healthy dose of fear) to join one of the former partners there and two of my associate colleagues to open a start-up boutique law firm. So far, it has been a very exciting, and challenging experience, and we haven’t even begun practicing law yet!
After annoying Wendy and Shelby with snippets of pre- I Am The Man Anthrax, pre- South Of Heaven Slayer, and a little taste of Peace Sells from Megadeth, I decided to compile a list of albums (yes kids, albums- ask your parents what that means) I absolutely wore out as a 14-16 year old. The albums I listened to while locked away in my room with headphones on. The ones that created a bit of hearing damage. Albums which defined my disturbed adolescence and provided me with some fuel to get through some pretty rough patches.
Chocolate-Chestnut Cake
Let me also just say that these colors were challenging for me. I work with "beachy" colors - blue, turquoise, green, etc. Neutrals aren't anything I'm used to working with. So I didn't know what went with what.
At the museum the rock will be fitted into an installation where it will appear to be levitated. Viewers will be able to walk under it and experience this amazing creation of artist Michael Heizer.
Same goes for Michael Penney's apartment kitchen. (Love him!) There is lots of brilliant decorating to distract here, from the wallpapered wall, to the light fixture, to doors taken off the upper cabinets, to the baskets above the counter tops. Even the dark trim on the window keeps your attention away from standard issue counter tops, appliances, and cabinets (which by the way were those 70s era wood trim cabinets before he painted them).
Duo for Clarinet and Bassoon No.1 in C Major WoO 27
For some odd reason he refused to bury his head in the sand
Your bones are constantly being broken down and rebuilt. In fact, every 12 months they completely replace themselves—all 236 of them! To do so effectively, your bones need all the help they can get. This is especially true for women because gender, menopause, and smoking, as well as eating disorders such as anorexia, can accelerate bone loss and contribute to the development of osteoporosis, a condition in which bones become porous over time and are more likely to break. According to the National Osteoporosis Foundation, osteoporosis affects 44 million Americans, 80% of whom are women.
Michael Wolff (for the Guardian) wrote today that ‘Rupert Murdoch is going to be run out of Britain’. Is that supposed to be a bad thing? Yes Murdoch will have to sell off his baby (The Sun) but maybe then the British media could be run by decent people instead of corrupt ones and MPs won’t be as scared to speak out against him for fear of their careers being ruined. I can only imagine it being like seeing sunlight after years of being kept in the dark, though perhaps not quite so drastic..
When meeting with the students for the first time, they explained the reason they got into fights was because they felt they were being “picked on.” A group of students constantly bullied them, and they got into the fights because they felt angry and wanted to lash out against the bullying.
At the beginning of the class, Linda glanced at the windows (we were in a room off the gym) she commented, "We should sell tickets to those guys".... I deliberately DID NOT LOOK TO SEE WHO WAS WATCHING US!
The responses, again from Hari Kumar, appear to be variations on a pro forma email. Kumar begins by managing expectations: ‘As you know, there are no guarantees in the publishing industry and we cannot guarantee that an agent would consider taking you on, even after a referral from Brit Writers.’ After a boost of praise for the work (‘This is a captivating, stylishly written book and is timely as it addresses current issues’) Kumar identifies problems with the synopsis, pitch or formatting that mean that ‘the assessors could not refer your work to agents immediately.’
2 1/2 cups flour
They do know how to ingratiate themselves with ageing Australians though. The girl insisted on seeing my proof of age before she’d serve me alcohol. Usually I’m only asked for proof of age when using my seniors card. We established that I’d been over the legal drinking age for about 40 years.
Happy Saturday everyone, hope you are all well and enjoying the weekend. A very Happy Mothers Day to all you wonderful Mums out there, hope your day is full of smiles, hugs and kisses from your families.
That is a highly creative spin, I have to say! I see nothing in the entire text of the Book of Daniel to lend any credence to the assertion that Daniel and co both ate ‘dainty meats’ and ‘drank wine’ before and after this episode, but it shows one take. Let’s compare that to Barnes:
Beware of the bull! The dancing cock is right:
Be you
nature loves itself
Great photos are one of the most important things to get right if you sell online. Your photographs are your virtual shop window: If they are not light, bright and eye-catching then often buyers will surf right past your store without even noticing your work. Really beautiful photographs will bring buyers through your virtual door and keep them there long enough to remember your creations.
Again, even among a relatively small group—10 percent of Egypt’s population—there are marked differences in aspirations and in vision for the future of Egypt and the Copts.
Maine was the perfect way to end our weeklong New England vacation. As cliché as this sounds, it really looked like the "pictures". The coast was pure beauty and the weather was perfect, nice sunshine during the day with crisp air in the evening. And, I have to say, road tripping with a child is definitely the way to go. Lyla's been on over 10 flights since she's been born, and as wonderful it is to travel, at this age, a slow paced road trip of 7 hours, was much easier for us than a 2 hour flight, if you can believe it! Aside from cost, now I get why family road trips are a common summer time mainstay. Oh and another little treat - every morning around 4 or 5 am, little Lyla Belle would make her way in bed with us. This my friends, was a "when on vacation only" deal. I just don't want that habit to become a part of our daily lives. Although, it's pretty sweet for her to snuggle with us, you just really don't sleep. Most of the time she sleeps sideways, pushing both Patrick and I near the edge of the bed. She's made it clear, she is the queen in this household. And she deserves it. It's amazing how a little 25 lb. child calls the shots.
A big "THANK YOU" to all the cakecentral.com members who told me that you can color modeling chocolate with food coloring gel. I had originally thought the chocolate coloring rules applied (only use oil-based or powder colors), but that is not the case! Here's a dollop of Americolor Burgundy.
As we get closer to my son’s graduation in May, I’ve been reflecting on all the things I’ve learned about The Citadel and being a supportive parent to a cadet in this leadership school. I thought I’d share a few of my insights in the hope that a parent just starting their journey will find these insights helpful.
“I Went to the Hospital” captures the transient nature of his life as he ponders the fragility of it all when you face your mortality. He talks of a bout with illness and embarks on a narrative detailing all of the thoughts we all have when the unknown looms large and casts shadow puppets of our regrets and missteps upon the walls of our examination room. It is a meditation on mortality and straddles the line between paranoia and confessional, but that wash of organ and gently jangling chords make it seem like a gentle jaunt once you soak in it a few times.
The Rainforests of the world are estimated to contain approximately 80% of the green and flowering plants in existence. Each 2.5 acres of rainforest may hold up to 1500 species of higher plants and 750 different types of trees. We are over farming, logging, and developing rainforest areas beyond points where they can recover. The earth is set up as a giant terrarium (this is an overly simplistic example, but it suits the post), the plants and trees in the rainforest are emitting oxygen for our atmosphere, oxygen and other chemicals necessary for our survival, yet we seem to think the wood and paper products we get from there are more important. I bet most people have no idea the beauty which lives in the rainforests.
Makes enough to frost 1 batch of cupcakes
I couldn't find any portraits of Cornelius, but I found something better: the following description from a mid-19th century journal: "...old Cornelius had the ice cream and strawberries of everything in life -- in commerce, in politics, in wives, in finances and in religion....He had a peculiar way of carrying his spectacles in his hand, behind his back while he looked at all the pretty girls he met."
1/2 cup/1 stick margarine or butter, softened
Over the three novels Talos engages in the warfare you would expect from a Warhammer 40,000 novel only rarely. Dembski-Bowden has taken the opportunity to explore almost everything outside of the signature battles played out on tabletop. Talos and his fellow Astartes are portrayed with depth, complexity and contradiction. Talos himself is sometimes noble, but is still a traitor, a heretic and a monster. He despises chaos-tainted Space Marines like his captain and pities his Khorne-claimed brother Uzas, but he still indulges in slaughter and cruelty without remorse.
We have a fun challenge for you this week -- a 3-2-1 challenge. What is that? You need to have 3 different papers, 2 different embellishments and 1 image. If your sentiment is your main image that is fine, but if you have a colored image and want to add a sentiment, then that sentiment will not count as your one image. Here are just some simple rules for you to follow:
With only removable badges to differentiate the agencies, the system will pose a high risk of misrepresentation.
My tea's gone cold,
World's Cutest Calendar Girl....
A number of tourists from all over the world are visiting Kerala with package tour to explore its fascinating attractions. Beautiful palm-fringed beaches, serene & scenic backwaters (a large network of several water bodies), lovely lakes, historical monuments, ancient temples, ayurvedic resorts & parlors, luxurious houseboat cruises and verdant hill stations are featured attractions of many Kerala travel packages.
Of course, later in the year, I also have the garden to keep me busy. This will be the first Spring I can plant super early, so I am making some plans of what to plant. Yum! I hope this is the year my kids magically start liking vegetables. LOL
Lio feels most alive when he’s with Craig. He forgets about his broken family, his dead brother, and the messed up world. But being with Craig means being vulnerable, and Lio will have to decide whether love is worth the risk.
Well, they screwed up RESURRECTION MAN big time. I think Alan Glynn’s WINTERLAND fits the bill.
Passive: The ball(object) was hit(verb) by John (subject).
The architect’s sleight did he praise in his mind
*Flat Stanley's Worldwide Adventures
Some choose to self-publish because they want the autonomy and freedom to work without a publisher; others use it as a method to gain some authority which could catch the eye of one of the big boys who may then offer them a deal and there’s a fair chunk who simply find themselves unable to get an agent/publisher, full stop.
Then as the iron issues didn't get better....but became more under control...something else happened. Not really, but for those of you aware of the situation, it did. My struggle with anxiety and depression took an all time dive. One that nearly had me hospitalized. Three weeks off of work, majority unpaid ....I went back to work right before Thanksgiving. I was not ready to return. There were several more crash and burn days. There still are. The moral of that experience is...gastric bypass effing sux when it comes to NEEDING an antidepressant. Currently, I am unmedicated. Just a matter of time...I'm worknf diligently with someone outside my therapist and pdocs office to be preventive.
‘What do you Want?
And in this fast-paced world,
In the right corner in the photo below, you will also see 4 white boxes. Those are photo boxes from the craft store, Michael's, which I purchased on sale for only $2.50 each...(one of my future BIG projects!).
Sawyer loved the singing snowman and especially appreciated when he pulled out his ukelele. Sawyer grabbed up his own "guitar" and played along.
So not wanting to waste a perfectly good day of shopping we headed to an antique mall even further south that wasn't awesome, but not terrible. And determined to have something to blog about and to not have wasted 5 hours and a half a tank of gas i did find a few things after like 3 hours.
Step 1: Finely grate peel of 4 limes
Over the last few months allegations of serious wrong doing concerning senior British National Party officials have been spread both within and outside the British National Party.
I would not wish this malady on my worst enemy. So much more needs to be done on this issue.
The key lessons to take back from this were:
The boyfriend loves Black and White cookies. So I decided I would make him a batch for Valentine’s Day.
start giving it with understanding and by revelation. Begin to act by faith in
every project along the way!! Be sure to leave
A peaceful transition scenario with Najib to take responsibility
with most things food-related, I am taste motivated and I can say with certainty , in that department, soaked beats canned hands down. I cooked dried chickpeas and black beans shortly after the assignment in March. One little package yields a LOT of beans and though I had hopes of experimenting with other beans, there’s only so much hummus and huevos rancheros one family can eat. I pictured my kids in their future therapist’s office recounting their month of legumes. So it’s time to switch gears.
TILDA: Oh, thank you. That’s wonderful. I’ll take both.
Before I tell you some TRUE facts, let me correct some common misconceptions about Rhodes and the Colossus. (BTW, Colossus just means a "colossal" or "massive" figure.)
Thank you to my pastor, Brian Hammond, who showed up at the hospital almost immediately with his wife Tandy and waited with me to hear if Erin was going to live. He prayed with me. He cried with me. He stayed with me late into the night and even into the next morning. He even showed up again before he went into work the next day. He is a dear friend and a man who I hold in the highest regard. You’re presence changed things… I know it changed me. Thank you, Brian!
There are some fees applied for registration, certification and other extra work done
I am just trying to keep on keeping on!
Workplace Gallery is pleased to present our first solo exhibition by Matt Stokes.
Before leaving the lunch, I got to sit down with Maimonide owner and French restaurateur and hotelier Cyril Aouizerate and get to know him a bit better. A father of four children, Cyril flies back and forth between here and his home in France, spending a week out of every month in NY. He is a former professor of philosophy, and named Maimonide after a famous Jewish philosopher.
The Duchess of Langeais
On our summer calendar for yesterday, I had hand-written the plan to visit my dad. It is interesting to me that I didn’t type him into our schedule but rather wrote him in as if he were an after-thought. The thought to visit him has not been flippant, but rather a consuming backdrop to everything. For months I have battled, internally, with how quickly I should get to his bedside. I’ve rushed there before, on a number of occasions, and each time he has slowly recovered, left the health facility, found himself holed up in a seedy hotel or short-term apartment and then started the whole thing over again. I don’t live near him, so the hospital visits and jail stints have happened in my absence. I’ve needed to see him, and yesterday was the day.
Ok, enough championing of human rights! What do you think? Who’s role is it to stop unfair internships, or do you think they should even be stopped at all? Let me know!
Ok, I now know what kind of diaper bag I want.
If you weren't going to go because you're only a beginner and don't think you're good enough, a lot of people are feeling that way and that's why we're going to be teaching - we want beginners there so we can teach them stuff.
Further to which, it was part of an experiment… I simply wanted to discover how quick the process could be. In that instance, all was done and dusted from first tapping in the album title into a search engine to landing in my I-Tunes within fifteen minutes.
NetFashionAvenue.com carries the hottest prom dresses and evening gowns from brands such as Jovani, Sherry Couture, Faviana and more. Visit NetFashionAvenue.com for the latest in designer prom dresses, pageant dresses, evening gowns and accessories.
Release of his educational records, would of course bring to an end the rumour that he initially applied to study as a "foreign student", but yet again, Obama chooses not to disprove that rumour either. The reason can only be down to arrogance, or there is something he does not want us to know.
My co-worker mentioned that she bought a Budweiser brand beer that had Clamato already added to it... and she didn't care for it but she'd bring it in for me to try. I never minded tomato juice or salt in my beer from my days back at this restaurant, I remember it being pretty tasty - and of course it's FREE. I'm no dummy. I'll take free food or al-key-hol any day. I figure it'd be a kick in the pants to pour a glass of tomato juice beer and think back on those days of yore. Of course I told her I'd give it a try.
Can it get any easier??
He’s got a new one out now I don’t even know what it’s about
Bazzill CS
And here’s where the nihilism takes over. I’m sure someone has already said what I’ve said up here, I don’t know who (in a much more eloquent way, Nietzsche may have said it in his book Beyond Good and Evil, I’m not sure because I tried reading it and did not get very far because I didn’t think it was written very well). So, really, what’s the point of thinking about stuff like this? What’s the point of yearning to be an adventurer as a young lad when all the lands accessible are conquered.
I have all Shane's blogs emailed straight to my yahoo mail. Every day when I check the mail I'm on pins and needles hoping and praying that one of HeroinHeads memoirs will be in my inbox. Even though he only blogs about twice a month I have my kit next to me everytime I login to my email. My kit you wonder, yes my kit.
The 60mm round base is excellent for modeling. You only have one general, so work a little extra on him. Here´s what I do.
chalkboard paint
Back in November, Satan finally scratched an itch he has had for a while. He brewed a porter from a special Zymurgy issue from last year. And he used licorice! This from the guy who once told me that licorice would never pass his lips.
approval of any project affecting their lands or territories and other
For lunch we went to a vegetarian restaurant we had spotted earlier, Riverside Vegetaria. It is beside the river and we could have had a table outside but the weather wasn’t really suitable as it was cold and threatening rain. We had masala dosai which was quite filling though Tigger encountered an unexpected “hot spot” in hers that caused some discomfort. When we first arrived, the background “music” was a sound track of (I suppose) monks chanting endlessly on only two notes. After some time, this began to irritate me considerably though later the volume was turned down, which made it easier to bear. The management should realize that just because one is vegetarian does not mean that one is Buddhist or even religious or that one will find monkish chanting a suitable accompaniment to a meal. There was a good selection of food available from snacks and side dishes to main courses. To judge from the number of customers, it is quite popular, despite (or because of) being vegetarian.
On the paperwork front, I'm pleased to report that we have our Certificate of Citizenship, and our Certificate of Foreign Adoption from the DC Department of Health, which is equivalent to a local birth certificate. She'll have her Social Security Card in a week or two, and then we'll probably apply for a passport a little later. No international travel is in the works just yet, but the little one will be attending at least five weddings this year. Only four of them are in Michigan. :)
Its almost camping season and what’s more fun than camping and riding! Get planning with these helpful hints!
but the crazy thing is, the way it looks right now, he’s going to be re-elected next November. And you know what makes this craziness down-right bizarre? That this is probably the best thing that could happen to the USA and the world because, when you look at what the opposition is offering as alternatives, any rational being is forced to the conclusion that a wishy-washy, infinitely flexible Chicago Democrat boss is better than any of the various varieties of lunatic the Republicans are likely to nominate.
Because their actions are closely watched by millions of young men and women on television, their lips are closely read by all who can.
Bobby's first Duke single, "It's My Life, Baby," was released in 1955. Two years later, he scored with the seminal Texas shuffle "Farther Up The Road" (115 k, 10 sec.), which went to number 1 on the R&B charts. Follow-up records included two 1961 hits, "I Pity the Fool," which also made it to number 1 on the R&B charts, and "Turn on Your Love Light," which went to number 2. "That's the Way Love Is," a 1963 release, gave Bland his third number 1 hit.From 1957 to 1961 Bland played the chitlin' circuit with Junior Parker and his band, the Blue Flames. But in 1961 Bland broke with Parker, went out on his own, and rose to his greatest popularity. Because Bland neither composed nor played an instrument, he relied on others for songs and inspired instrumentation. Joe Scott, his bandleader and arranger, and for years one of Duke label owner Don Robey's chief talent scouts, helped create Bland's big-band sound. Just as important to Bland's sound was guitarist Wayne Bennett, who complemented the horns and Bland's vocals with jazz-influenced solos,a la T-Bone Walker and B.B. King.
As I watched my dear ones gather, which banished strife and care
It is estimated that 300,000 children in the UK aren’t able to live with their parents. Most of them are living with grandparents, older siblings or other family members. This could be because parents have died or because of parental drug or alcohol misuse, illness, domestic violence, disability, imprisonment, abuse or neglect of children or a combination of these factors.
The Rt Hon Gordon Brown MP
If the snow has found you today, I hope you enjoy it as it will soon be gone!
Kath
An IDF spokesperson said intelligence assessments called for the deployment of more soldiers.
Make It Easy
I found this song by Selah called “I Will Carry You” (for which this blog was named after)
The stillness that surrounds you there
In recent years the Tory party abandoned nationalism to promote Globalism. Its traditional supporters are still marooned. There is not a single Conservative councillor in Newcastle, Sheffield, Liverpool or Manchester and the party is hardly any better off in many other places while the working classes or most people in Scotland and Northern England will never be reconciled with them. Where the Liberal Democrats have become the main opposition to Labour they are likely to suffer a fall in popularity due to their coalition with the Tories at national level. Yet no organisation is capable of countering a proper critique of globalisation when we begin to offer a proper one.
04. Weight of the World
6 Paz e futebol
Depending on the length of clip you’ve used on your trimmer, you may be tempted to just roll with this more modern, suburban, 80s-era presentation. This may be tempting in theory, and even appearance, but will likely fill with fail in practice. I’ll explain why shortly…
“Hm!”
84. Soil & Pimp Sessions - One Step Beyond (3:51)
When they got to Greer’s apartment Jacobs hesitated with his hand on the knob. Inpatient Reilly pushed past him and stepped inside. He wasn’t sure what he was expecting to find. A bunch of guys from the roach motel hanging out waiting to play some practical joke perhaps. He surveyed the room and unharnessed his weapon. Jacobs came up behind him.
Dread says, No! She was a witch. I see more of a Gloria Steinem thing happening.
I have to believe in God. I have to believe that He is real and He will do what He says He will do.
"Inception" is about Dom Cobb (played by Leonardo DiCaprio), who is an expert at infiltrating others' dreams. He plies his trade in Europe because he fled America when accused of killing his wife Mal (played by Marion Cotillard). When a job at the beginning of the film goes bad, Cobb is forced by a Japanese businessman named Saito (played by Ken Watanabe) to plant an idea into the owner of an energy company, Robert Fischer, (played by Cillian Murphy). A team is assembled to infiltrate the dreams, all of them bringing their specific talents: The Architect (Ellen Page), The Forger (Tom Hardy), The Chemist (Dileep Rao) and Cobb's Right Hand Man (Joseph Gordon-Levitt).
Now, this is not the first time anyone has suggested that I engage in some kind of hetero-farce in order to get more justice for my homo-relationship.
Sin is appealing, if it wasn’t, we wouldn’t still be screwing up, would we?
p.m.
How great is this zinc topped antique table in Steve's dining room/library? Steve is lucky enough to live in near a major city where the antique shop actually sent this out to be done for him, unlike myself who calls every sheet metal fabricator in town to have them essentially laugh at me and tell me that they've never done anything like that and have no idea why I'd want it. Ah ... yes, the pinnacle of high style right here in WNY.
And that was the next step. Having concluded that it was not a Workers State they had to come up with a theory of what it actually was. Hence the argument of one faction that it was in fact a form of State Capitalism – a theory which requires that all of the criteria set out by Marx about what Capital actually is, be overthrown, essentially in favour of a Ricardian definition of Capital – and of the other, which baulked at this, and had to come up with a theory, which postulated some new unheard of class of Bureaucratic Collectivists. This theory is not as crass as the theory of State Capitalism, but it is crass nevertheless. Likewise it has to overthrow the basic categories, and theories of Marxism that define class, and that define the relation between the State and Civil Society. They tend to adopt the ideas of Eugene Duhring in relation to the means by which ruling classes acquire and retain power in society by the use of force, rather than as Marx and Engels demonstrated, arising and reproducing themselves naturally as a result of the functioning of the Mode of production itself. Another version of this Bureaucratic Collectivist theory was put forward by Hillel Ticktin. Unlike most of the classic Bureaucratic Collectivists, Ticktin had actually undertaken some detailed study of the USSR. Anyone who does so quickly realises that not only does the State Capitalist theory disintegrate, not just because it is alien to Marxist theory, but also because the actual economic system in the USSR simply did not conform to what State Capitalism requires, but such an analysis also shows that there is simply no basis for postulating the existence of a ruling Bureaucratic Class. That is true probably in bourgeois sociological terms, let alone in the Marxist terms of relation to the means of production, and so on. Ticktin was reduced to an impossible, unMarxist position, though, as a result, of denying that the USSR was any kind of Workers State, but unable to identify any other ruling class to take its place as the basis of the State. Yet, a State most certainly did exist, and according to Marxist theory the State only exists as a class state, as the means by which a ruling class resolves the differences within it, and defends itself against other ruling classes, and against other classes within its borders.
See and see
She is regarded as a ‘legend’ who ‘has left behind quite a musical legacy’.
One day when I was at CalArts the animator Glen Keane gave a lecture and a handout on "Dynamics of Animated Drawing" (full handout can be seen here) and it contained a sentence that I didn't really take notice of at the time, but over the years I've realized that there's a lot of wisdom contained within that thought.
Testers were required to stay in the booth anywhere from three to thirty hours at a time. Symptoms of a term in the box ranged from catatonia, convulsions, violent outbursts, to total mental shutdown. Usually they were found “curled up in a corner like lab rats”(DNE6) but a few had different responses. Mark Bronwell launched himself at the beta team once the door was forced open. An unnamed female employee(dubbed “the coffee girl” by Oscen and Ballard) was found clinging upside-down to the ceiling of the booth, staring at the demo team. She took half an hour to extricate because she was “creeping everyone out and no one wanted to touch her.”(DNE 18)
Take my Facebook page, for instance. Immediately after posting about the discovery of The Bullshit’s spread to my bones, I received 36 friend requests, all from people who’d read my news, found themselves shocked and, in many cases, wanted to leave a kind word on my wall. Add a brain tumour and that ‘months-and-not-years’ talk into the mix and my daft little corner of the
Taylor (5 years 5 months): The family gathered in Cedar Rapids’ Bever Park for a potluck Mother’s Day picnic. Taylor, more accustomed to “nuggets”, was happy to see that someone had brought “chicken with bones”. (#575)
It’s not as if we lack knowledge about post-traumatic states. Everything I’ve touched on is taught in Therapy 101, but making these steps personal isn’t easier just because you — or a therapist, counselor, or minister – knows how to analyze what’s going on. Self-awareness is the key, and it moves in different directions with every passing hour. Feeling safe one minute and panicked the next, at peace today but devastated tomorrow, keeps a person from any sense of control and normalcy. Without an anchor of objectivity, the healing process becomes chaotic and thus fuels the threat of randomness that is the problem you are trying to solve. The situation calls for a place of stability inside, however difficult that place is to find. Self-awareness if fluid, yes, but it rests upon a solid foundation known as the core self.
In the case of the individuals in the photo, there is a strong element of exhibitionism. However, I have met many individuals here who, by any reasonable definition, really are social misfits, with extreme and very self-indulgent lifestyles, the nature of which may not be apparent to the outsider at all.
“Ignorance is bliss” you say, but not really! If you’re just feeling unfilled in some way, or have some unexplainable exasperating gnawing in your heart, you may be unhappy. I’m sorry to address this on Valentines, but it needed to be said! I’m not sure if Cupid deals only with people hooking-up, or has to do with self-love as well; I imagine the former is applicable.
I adore just “looking” though, whether or not I buy anything.
Step 9:
Next time if I am in the area, I definitely want to stay longer and do more kayaking. If you are coming to Nelson, try kayaking. Wonderful adventure on the water. Guaranteed!
I had lost control of my ability to heal myself and the ability to continue training. For someone who loves physical activity, it was a horrible feeling. I was completely helpless. If only I had just taken my time during the acrobatic sessions instead of trying to advance too quickly. If only I had sought proper treatment sooner. The bargaining stage didn’t last long. I knew I had to get treatment and that this injury was far worse than I had imagined.
6) Invest in nice sofa
book picture here.
(PS. Don’t be alarmed Mother, these are not real tattoos!)
This spat is causing the ANC to tie itself into knots. When my Institute pointed out that forcing employers in the Western Cape to conform to the national racial breakdown would necessitate the (illegal) dismissal of thousands of coloured workers, President Jacob Zuma said companies would have flexibility to conform to national or regional demographics.
Papers are Recollections
Mother’s Day is just around the corner and many of you are probably thinking about what to get her. Cupcakes have always been the safe gift for this special day. But, there is one thing to keep in mind about eating cupcakes.
My experience as a girl scout started when I was in elementary school when my parents realized that they wanted me to be socialized and get to know other girls. When I joined, I was put with the third year “brownies” since those were the girls my age. If you know anything about girl scouts, which I or my parents clearly didn’t, then you know that joining a group of girls that are already as veteran as “3rd year brownies” it is like making a five-year old join the varsity basketball team, or giving alcohol to an eight year old. At least in my small town in was.
To garnish, add a tiny amount of olive oil around the pasta and top it off with some freshly chopped parsley.
With tremendous respect for Heidi Hayes Jacob, I permitted myself again to relish in her words, to imagine the possibilities they hold for our school, and to find energy, rather than discomfort, in the challenges she poses. I formulated my own essential question, which stood in the background of my learning for the rest of the day: How can we become comfortable with discomfort through the experience of rapid change in our schools?
and I didn't have a fresh battery backup in the clock.). So I spent a half hour
I do not want to be forever known as That Dim Fantasy Chick Who Thought It Was OK to Buy Votes. Or That Dim Fantasy Chick Who Had No Respect For Writers of Contemporary Fiction. If you want to think of me merely as That Dim Fantasy Chick? That's fine by me. It would be a vast improvement.
My head is well and truly spinning with the amount of stuff I still have to do. I have one more work shift to force myself through before I can truly put my mind to nothing but our vacation, but my head is a little ahead of the game. Yesterdays shift was tough, today is going to be near impossible. Thankfully we don’t leave until late afternoon tomorrow, so I will have time to get stuff done.
I'd honestly really like to live in Holywood. Its such a nice area, definitely something to look into for the future.
Chimney Monsters
Its hexagram is the pentecostal fire of the darkness burning in the vacuum bond
Mark said he has had 15 years of frustration, and he is going to use it all up on Randy Orton. He wants Josh to interview him after he wins the World Heavyweight Title.
I’ve narrowed the search criteria down to the players who have scored 8 or more times this season and who are 26 or under. The list below is the guys who on average have the cajones to score when it matters most.
If you walked up my stairs today, You'd get a Heady scent of Carnations. But it's actually from an Heirloom Azalea plant I picked up in the "Close Out" bin several years ago for $4 Bucks.
rather because it is the one thing needed. From the grandest overtures to
Marmite is the best spread, in the world, ever. And the vast majority of non-New Zealanders hate it. They loathe and detest it. This is mainly because it has an extremely strong flavour. It claims to be a yeast spread but it doesn’t really taste like yeast. It does taste like something, but I’m not entirely sure what. It’s yummy, though.
I ran my first half marathon this past fall
Hope you enjoyed these! :)
Pattaya is a city made for fun on the northeastern coast of the Gulf of Thailand. It is situated in Chonburi Province around 150 kilometres south of Bangkok. In the Sixties, Pattaya was hardly known, but the American soldiers fighting in Vietnam began using it for R&R and it started to grow. Pattaya is most well-known for its entertainment and its nightlife, but in fact it has a lot more than that to offer.
In these things that come against us it’s not always easy to just let go and let God…is it? In fact, if we’re honest, most of the time…most of us (myself included) try to overcome these things by our will power…rather than depending upon God…but that’s pride. Any time that we want to do anything apart from God is pride, and what it tells me is that in my wanting to do things of my strength is that I still have a lot of pride that needs to melt away. I need to decrease, and He needs to increase.
The Giant made me pasta, which is probably my favorite food… we had fancy things, cheese, bread, olives, marinated artichoke hearts… all sorts of things… then the beautiful ravioli with a white sauce with wine and sausage and I don’t know what else… with a delicious fruity beer. Small mixed berry pies for dessert, and other drinks that we didn’t even get to.
At first I had no clue what to write about. Yeah I could blog about my weight loss journey, but all my passion is not for weight loss; it goes much deeper than that!I live a crazy busy life, yet so boring and mundane to many. I have a beautiful family; I'm married to the love of my life and we have a daughter and a son together. We both work full time and like most families with two working parents, someone else gets the pleasure of keeping our kids while we work.
Cubic Zirconia is also distinguishable from natural diamond in that it is unusually flawless and perfect in color. It’s just too good to be true. No, we definitely don’t want to buy Cubic Zirconia. Let’s just leave it for the losers who watch The Home Shopping Network.
"The biggest drops were nights spent by French and Spanish visitors, 16 and 25 percent, respectively, which make up the bulk of Morocco's tourists.
These unspoken attitudes and thoughts may go unnoticed by everyone else, but these things offend the heart of God. When we start thinking WE can achieve something or we have something special to give, when we desire the life of someone more glamorous, and when we look at ourselves a little too much, or allow our eyes to linger too long on the opposite sex, we are treading on dangerous ground instead of holy ground. Remember, servants are dispensable… They come and go. God can use anyone for the events He so graciously CHOOSES and gives us the privilege to be a part of in this life. To use us, God needs brokenness and Humility; He needs us undone.
Pre-feminist sexism aside (again, it was a different time, they came from a different culture,) the song gets enough of a pass on its other merits to get a ten.
@paradiseghirl88
Winners and losers,
Derby-Lewis, a former Conservative Party politician, is serving a life sentence for his role in the assassination of SA Communist Party secretary general Chris Hani.
Another poll (Politico-GW University) shows the exact same Romney lead over Obama. Since we are so far from election day, the most interesting and perhaps important numbers are the split with independents. Romney is out-polling Obama by double digits. The very factors that worked against him in the Republican primary are working for him with the general electorate.
If I could afford it, I'd buy a ticket to Auckland, NZ and haunt the High Street until I got photographed by Wallace... I wonder if I could justify it to my department for a grant? Hahahaha! Oh, if only...
I can't wait to see what you create!!!
‘Sure, not a problem. No, wait, there’s a problem,’ I’m told.
This was probably true for the earliest storytellers in history. It was true back in the middle ages. It was probably true way before written language existed. Storytellers needn’t write their stories… No.
century. But my most cherished book was a gift from my husband - a 1941 first edition of Random Harvest by James Hilton. It is my favorite love story hands down and I wish Mr. Hilton was still alive so he could sign it for me.
In winter, test your skills skiing and snowboarding at the mountains - Cardrona Alpine Resort, Treble Cone, Snow Farm and Snow Park. Nearby are Coronet Peak and The Remarkables though these mountains are closer to Queenstown. For more information, click here.
Anyway, I'm impressed with the sacrifices that women make when it comes to having children. They are troopers for putting up with all the discomforts and the outright pain and sacrifice that accompanies bearing children. This is yet one more reason that supports my theory that women are way cooler than guys.
1 Tbl chipotle pepper in adobo sauce, chopped
A friend with two kids recently showed me her silverware drawer. To save time, she decided to throw out the plastic insert. Now she just dumps the forks, spoons and knives in there willy-nilly. Her new system saves a few minutes every time she unloads the dishwasher, and it’s still easy enough to find the utensils she needs.
and with some delicious flavors, it can be served either
Name: Tetsuya Bessho
So why not combine the two? This is all you need to make a really quick healthy and fun snack for a fussy star eating toddler .
Now, for the technical details should you be insane enough to want to do this to your own kitchen. As I said above, you need Hydrogen Peroxide and Baking Soda. I had a large bag of Baking Soda from Costco and two large bottles of Hydrogen Peroxide and I used almost all of each. My kitchen and hallway are about 250 sq ft. total. So, I made up the mixture in a bowl, then used a spoon to pour it into the grout line. I worked in one area at a time, letting it sit for a couple minutes on one area. I used a small scrub brush to really scrub into the grout and tile surface. Cello sponges and a small bucket of water mopped up the messy grey sludge that came up. (GAK!) I changed my cleansing water frequently, as it doesn’t make sense to rinse tile with black water. In the end, I also had to clean the floor to remove any white residue remaining from the Baking Soda.
Well friends, August is over!
The guy replied, "Yes, a little. I couldn't quite make up my mind because there were so many."
Now the statement has a value, and the value it fits is one of the three pieces that make up the nine chord sum, or the entire nine chord sum.
Oh well, they were still fun to make and even more fun to wear!
Here are some common Prepositional Verbs with Go:
Enough of this grief stuff!
I saw a great tutorial on how to make this ribbon flower but now I can't remember who did it or where I even found it...please let me know if you know of the clever lady who did the video tutorial for this so I can give credit where it's due!!!
The fact that Labour couldn’t even maintain their votes this time around says that there are a significant number of people who are yet to be convinced of which party to vote for. What is for sure is that they do not want to vote for the Lib Dems right now. Many previously active campaigners aren’t campaigning and some aren’t even voting for the party they belong to so it is no surprise that many of our previous voters wouldn’t turn up to vote for the party.
⅓ cup bourbon (Coke may be substituted)
This red one is a Sunbeam, belonging to Howard,
My first instinct when we decided to make it a girls weekend was that it would be a great experience for Emerson to get some good mommy-only time. No baby brother to steal the show. Then I realized how much easier it was going to be to travel with her and not have to drag all the baby stuff along. Then I realized that it also meant I would get two full nights of sleep! As disappointed as I was that my family would not get to see the baby, I was genuinely excited about the decision and looking forward to some time alone with my girl.
All in all, a wonderful time at Wood and Vine, to mark an otherwise would-have-been painful passage to yet another addition to The Number (that is all age is, right?). For me it decidedly has all the makings of a new favorite in Hollywood, joining the ranks of Library Bar, Public Kitchen + Bar, and Komida.
Chicken Fajitas: (Can use beef, pork or shrimp too)
_ Creating an index for what’s in each of our nearly 750 family files – or __ historic home files – or __ subject files. This would be a great multiple volunteer project and would help researchers as well as CCHS staff.
The only problem? Well, I have to finish my Driver’s Ed course first. And a history project that I’m doing with a friend. And convince my mom that I’m not taking on too much. And find the money. And…and…and…
The Duke Lacrosse case is an event which every white person with a son should be aware of, I have merely scratched the surface of what took place. For those wishing to know more, I would recommend the following publications:
Sunrise Point by Robyn Carr
lots of typing and "swearing" of documents
Jack rolled over with a mock gasp of pain, holding his arm and rolling on the couch dramatically. Zephyr, sunning in a window, muttered about human silliness.
Then when I'm already head to toe (or thigh) in black and white I feel like the rest of the outfit needs to be black and white too, because I've already launched the bulk of my outfit into monochrome mode and adding any other colours will only look disruptive and strange. Like when you watch a black and white movie and randomly bring in a few bursts of colour the whole cinematic effect will be ruined (unless they're incorporated in a controlled and deliberate artsy sort of way a la Sin City). OR maybe it's just me...
But what does it do? The Kari Komrad HUD is a photography HUD based on the idea of medium format film photography (square photography). When you wear the HUD, it creates an “overlay” that is captured once the picture is taken (according to instructions). You can choose among a variety of frames (Polaroid, 35mm, etc.), effects (scratches, lightrays, etc.) and color additions. In the photo above, I used the Polaroid – Coffee frame with Dust effect and orange color overlay.
TONY MARTIN
David Oakes as Juan Borgia
Not alone, buddy.......
Backs of dragons and dinosaurs such as Stegosaurus and Kentrosaurus are also similar in texture and form. The resemblance is uncanny!
Smart Meter Fires Blamed on Old Wiring Improper Installation and other.
judgment, and not hate those who look to you for guidance and Love in Truth. I see you in the places of
Location: The Dalek Crucible, Earth
This is one of my favorite chicken curry.It has strong taste of cilantro which i love..Its very easy to make ,u don have to stand near the stove stirring which i hate to do..this is done all in pressure cooker..Usually when guests come over and i plan to make some chicken dish, i make sure that i add some cream ,nuts paste or coconut milk to make the curry more creamier ..I hav this weird idea that goes in my head that unless i add some of these to the curry it won be rich and good ..But this is one such curry which doesn't need any of those extra fittings but does taste really good.
Randy
Hex points to Agatha's body and says "Put that in a cheap box." Then he picks up the burned body of Evelyn and says....
It's been thirty-one days of Household Binder heaven! We created, we shared, we drained our printer cartridges, we were binder-makin' fools! The time investment in the binder this month is sure to reap endless rewards for our family. I have always been intrigued by the idea, but it took making one to really see how this will create a new "ease" to our lifestyle.
Another form of this deadly disease of Cafeteria Catholicism is when someone goes to Mass, undertakes numerous devotions and has their own favourite apparition but disobeys Christ by harbouring resentment, refusing to forgive or condemning others for their sins without looking at their own. This is no less Cafeteria Catholicism - picking and choosing from a menu - and can only bring bitterness and not the joy that is offered by Our Lord.
Well, in continuing on with sharing my thoughts and being real...this post is another one of those. Thank you to those who sent me such thoughtful emails and posted such kind comments. They mean so much! I am blessed to have you all in my life. Thank you.
Can you believe it's November already? It's starting to get pretty chilly at night here, so I'm going to put our Christmas flannel sheets on the bed this week. =)
FCS SOFTWARE SOLUTIONS LIMITED Outcome of Board Meeting
That's right. One billion.
I'm here! I'm married. To Mr. Matrix of all people. What? I know! I can't believe my crazy damn luck. I suppose I am now Mrs. Matrix. We have a dog and a brand new place to live and life is good.
Set aside some time this week to sit with the Lord and ask Him to show you any areas of your life that call for repentance. Ask for the power of the Spirit to think and live differently. If there is sin that needs to be confessed, accept and trust the forgiveness that Christ offers. Whatever comes to light, trust that the Lord will come alongside and help you make the necessary changes so that you can settle deeply into His kingdom.
called me “walking wounded,”
'In the past, vodka has been used as a disinfectant. At 40 per cent proof, imagine what it can do to an area as sensitive as the eye? It is highly toxic.
Vanilla creme
Best Supp.Actress Helen Morgan, Show Boat (5 votes)
But Dante Lamb kicks all those UCLA Yale Hunter Columbia kids' asses. He acheived this when he beginning painting at 2 and selling his first work of art at 3. He was making graffiti throwups in crayon, and then started living on the streets of the NYC at age. Shortly after turning 3 years old and becoming more fearful that he would never gain recognition in his lifetime, he wandered into Deitch Projects and ended up doing some blow with the cute gallery girl and brokered a deal to sell a then unmade ironic videogame inspired painting to a hedge fund billionaire. Oh, he didn't? Well, what did he do? He sold a painting for 85 dollars to a bar in Georgia. That doesn’t count, that’s not special. It's pretty funny, though. I highly doubt he had anything to do with the sale. But that does indicate stardom if you just sit around making art and someone else does the selling. But 85 dollars is hardly professional, though. I mean how does he support himself on a price like that? Granted, he doesn’t live in NYC, or even Brooklyn or Hoboken, but still. I mean come on. Really, folks, please. He acheived this feat in 2002, so at age 7 he might be well considered a mid-to-late carreer artist.
To answer this question I thought it would be a good idea to share my own personal experiences in building my own DIY solar power system.
1 distribute
Let’s begin then, with defining faith. Ironically we’ve got to start off by identifying something that faith is not, and the first thing to say about faith is that Faith is not a feeling. For so long we have allowed ‘faith’ to be confused with a certain feeling of belief, a fervor, a kind of cheerful hope or ignorance, a “I don’t know I just believe!” with the accent on the ‘lieve‘ which is more suitable for girls who longingly daydream that they’re going to meet Justin Bieber and go on a date with him. In short, we have taken faith to be an emotion-packed wish. If you only wish hard enough, what you are believing in will come true. This is not to say that there is no emotion in your beliefs, that there aren’t periods in your Christian life when you will feel really faithful, and times when you won’t, but these feelings are not your faith. Faith, instead, is what you believe.
People who open stores locally, I need to help them. Their wares are usually just as good as what you would buy in the store. Why not buy from your neighbor if you can?
*giggles*
My Love - Ken Boothe (Wings)
she likes to sit at the kitchen island and do "homework".
Oh, and I found my dress. The third dress I tried on at my first bridal shop. I'll admit that I already knew what I was looking for. I love dresses and I know what necklines and shapes look best on me. Mom and I didn't quite agree, her favorite dress was similar to my junior prom dress in shape and although it was beautiful on me, it just wasn't my style. She also purchased my headpiece and I found shoes online that I love! R reads my blog so I can't post any pictures of my wedding day outfit but I can tell you that it's perfect for me!
15And Joshua, with all Israel, went back to the tent-circle at Gilgal.
On many occasions you have publicly stated that the diversity of New York City is our greatest strength, yet your words ring hollow, as we examine the lack of diversity within your administration. Furthermore, there is a complete omission of African American men in charge of any high level agency. You have four high level vacancies that deal predominantly with people of color. You now have an obligation to ensure that those positions be filled by individuals who represent the people those agencies serve.
JJ: “What about the Chappelle Show? This kid doesn’t know about Charlie Murphy!”
Here’s Milbank’s beef:
These are the words I would say
Still, though... That these two guys could come together out of such horrible adversity and find strength and comfort with each other... It sort of makes you a little misty, doesn't it?
Errr. Rudie, I think it's now called PlanetRomeo. Just an FYI =)
Homemade effects are fun. Naïve and enthusiastic and way to exaggerated, watching low budget flicks with cgi’ed blood and splatter isn’t the same thing. Ittenbach was at an early stage in his career here, but it’s already very clear where he’s going to go with his fantastic effects. These early movies are merely appetizers for the gore fests to come, and for each film his skills improved. That not saying that these effects don’t get the job done, the last ten minutes are one goddamned insane gorefest that pus a lot of others to shame, and Ittenbach’s past as a dental technician comes in handy when one devastating scene in graphic detail shows a drill splintering it’s way through teeth, sending pieces flying in all over the place.
Mariah Louie – CIEE Arts & Sciences Dar es Salaam, Tanzania
What I thought of the DJing: Excellent, and I really noticed the fun cortinas. Music for the milongas was of course all in tandas, put together at a professional level, and the cortinas were all great, calm-and-happy music - I loved Melina's British folk songs, and the switch to Queen later in the evening. DJing for the practicas was not in tandas, it was chosen for practice instead. The only departure from purely traditional music was Enrico's bizarre substitute for La Cumparsita, which was decidedly spaced-out, but might have had 'Abrazos' in the title, and I didn't care because I honestly couldn't move another step anyway and had already opened my mouth to tell my partner so. The full line up (with links to their websites rather than the Abrazos page) was:
Oh, oh praise Him!
Coming to rest in fragrant beds of pine
One Piece 664 (6:08 — 10:53)
She's a clever cookie, takes after her Dad, recently requesting climbing equipment for presents. That's easy, I thought, you can never spend too much money on beer or climbing equipment. Of course, the detail of exactly what to get would require a little bit of thought. Given that the weather this time of year is unpredictable, climbing gear might not get used until the summer and an all weather solution was needed.
Sometimes chatting with tourists can be a very enjoyable experience. They'll tell you how much they love the city, how much they wish they lived here, blah blah blah. You'll smile and nod and be on your merry way after a few minutes. Then... there's the other kind. You wonder why they ever left their suburban paradise. They complain so much you expect their exhausted tongues to be sagging out of their frowning mouths. I hope you don't meet this vaca-variety. They're often found with the "I have a cousin who" and are usually looking irritated like Paris is poking them between the butt-cheeks.
7. Surround yourself with like-minded individuals. This will do wonders for your self-esteem.
According to Chen’s friend (and Chinese human rights advocate) Bob Fu, Chen escaped from house arrest by climbing over a wall behind his house. He has found refuge now in a location described as 100% safe in Beijing. Chen had to navigate blindly both the back wall of his property and a small army of as many as 90 Communist guards, falling more than 200 times in the process,yet persevering to his victorious escape. In his triumph, Chen has done more than embarrass the Communist government, he has exposed it.
696. Grilled Shared Wings @ Tiki Bar Spring Mountain (Spring Mount, PA) 7:10 p.m.
The council’s decision was prompted by complaints from the defendants, all cited for driving 50 to 54 mph in a 35-mph zone in the 300 to 600 blocks of the bypass between October 2010 and April 2011, said City Councilor Kristin Szakos.
Father wants to purify, cleanse us so we are at the purest form so He can pour out His power without interference or obstructions.
In the lecture hall the War Chief arrives and the Doctor instantly recognises him, prompting him to run but Zoe is captured and taken for interrogation by the Security Chief, who uses a futuristic lie detector. The War Chief and the Security Chief clearly have a strong rivalry. The War Chief also reveals that he is not of the same species as the War Lords and that without his knowledge the War Games operation would not have been possible. I think it's really funny how the War Lords compartmentalise everything, with separate Chiefs of Science, Security and War. Also everyone seems to have these epic/ridiculous beards, I think the level of beard shows your rank. The more beard the higher up you are. The Chief Scientist even appears to grow a beard from episode to episode.
“Coincidence is God’s way of remaining anonymous.” Albert Einstein
This synchronization we do so well
Well... I took Sera to Rex's for a ride last Saturday.
Touhou: 2690
The term “safety of places of agricultural products” means that the quality of the soil, water body and atmosphere environment of the places of origin of agricultural products meet the requirements for the production of agricultural products of safe quality.
I had intended to walk down along the river, camera in hand, to take some photos of the beautifully ethereal atmosphere of the young leaves on the beech trees. However . . . someone (Miffy, the boys' mother) saw me going and decided she was going to come too, but she was complaining bitterly all the way until I turned round and retraced my steps. Here she is, yowling at me and telling me to Hurry Up! She is blind in one eye, but this doesn't seem to stop her hunting.
Yesterday I went to my moms and we had a good time cooking! I love hearing about/coming up with new recipes and actually making them. I get some satisfaction out of seeing the recipe itself come to life! We made these fabulous little quiche-like thingies. We put ham (You could put any type of lunch meat, or your could leave it out all together if you want to have a vegetarian meal, which I often do.) in the bottom of muffin tins and then we put some brie cheese at the bottom (You could use ANY cheese here. We only had brie--what a shame...brie is SO disgusting...) and then cracked an egg on top. Sprinkle with salt and pepper and pop those bad boys in the oven and cook them at about 375 for 12-15 minutes. Just keep an eye on them...take them out when the yolks are where you like them. I like slightly runny, myself :) You could add veggies such as spinach, broccoli, peppers, onions...oh! you could add salsa too and have a southwestern-y style breakfast. I snapped a shot of the end product so you can get a visual:
Turmeric powder
Then Jesus begins to talk about what I would call fence sitters they know what God expects yet they refuse or maybe they don’t quite know yet refuse to try to find out either way its a dangerous place to be. It is almost more dangerous you think your OK because you prayed some prayer and there was no repentance no change no seeking of God only self-serving attitudes that will get you into the I never knew you category.
First of all, the illusions of sipping champagne and basking in bridal camaraderie as you wait for your ‘aha’ moment seem to be a complete and absolute myth. I do not know where these images come from, (perhaps Hollywood chickflicks are the most likely culprit), but they could not be further from the experience I had. However, I will also acknowledge that New York City was perhaps not exactly the best place to escape the bridal princess syndrome that rages in Istanbul.
2. On a BLT as a sandwich spread instead of mayo
Tomorrow I get back to my busy life of busy plans and other busy people. Today it’s quality time I need to spend wisely. I am going to drink the rest of that bottle of wine, I may have more tart…. and I think I may rent a movie. Let the world stand still.
Tim Higgs (irl/ARS)
I am going to take all the credit for the creativity of this one. I was given these pinking shears a few months ago. In my cutting felt for flowers, I thought how it kind of looked like bow tie pasta. So, I cut up a bunch of little rectangles then tied them all in the middle with thread. A tad bit time consuming, I will admit, but worth it. So cute! Then I made this little bag with the see through window, remembered I had the twine and tad a! Bow tie pasta. But we call it hair bow noo noos (noodles). Hair bow noo noos are the favorite noodle of choice around here.
"Thank you, I guess." I think everyone Sam and Dean have helped in the last few years could have said it the exact same way. Bye, Scott. Good luck.
You will require “the friends of our friends are our friends” Principe as Intermediary or as Mediator role. Let us call this facilitator as Mediator he will open doors, ensure a warm reception for your upcoming visits, and assess the prospects for the proposal which you are planning and will present it.
-Giveaway prize may only be shipped to a valid USA address.
I ran in the Charlottesville Half Marathon on April 7, 2012 and finished the whole 13.1 miles without stopping or walking. Go me! Is set the goal in December, to run a half marathon, and I completed it. Check one off of the bucket list. It was a very long day, that started out at 2am, but ended with a great finish.
01. Deep Down (Main Title English) (03:10)
I'll be blunt here... if you expect your child to feel grateful to you for adopting him or her, then you are being boastful. Because you are, in effect, secretly saying "look at this great thing I did." Don't go there. And don't allow others to go there either. Instead, you need to express with all humility how much you have gained through adoption, at the expense of so many others, including your child. (That is not to say that we should not train our children to possess an overall attitude of gratitude rather than a sense of entitlement. But that's a whole 'nother topic.)
If you haven't already entered this month's Snazzys random prize draw (for the yummy stamps and some embellies from the collection) you'll find the link in my post over on the blog.
This week marks the end of Iwona Guest Designing with us here at TPE!!
We were supposed to do some shopping before I took her to physical therapy that day. We were supposed to do a lot of things during my break, because she too had it off for recovery.
cold stone
I neglected to clarify something technical in the original post about the gallery re-opening, so please consider this a kind of post-script.
A ship’s crew can generally be divided into four main categories: the deck department, the engineering department, the steward’s department, and other.
